1110 | granddaughter (noun): the daughter of your son or daughter | loc: Enkelin
  EN TS: Kisses from a granddaughter!
  de TS: Küsschen von der Enkelin!
  EN FS: Kisses from a grandson!
  de FS: Küsschen vom Enkel!
  EN TP: a granddaughter's kiss
  de TP: ein Kuss der Enkelin
  EN FP: a granddaughter's drawing
  de FP: eine Zeichnung der Enkelin
1112 | grandmother (noun): the mother of your mother or father | loc: Großmutter
  EN TS: Grandmother is making bread.
  de TS: Großmutter macht Brot.
  EN FS: Grandmother is making soup.
  de FS: Großmutter macht Suppe.
  EN TP: baking with grandmother
  de TP: Backen mit Großmutter
  EN FP: knitting with grandmother
  de FP: Stricken mit Großmutter
1115 | greece (noun): a sunny country in the south of Europe | loc: Griechenland
  EN TS: Dancing in Greece? Nice style.
  de TS: Tanzen in Griechenland? Schicker Stil.
  EN FS: Diving in Greece? Nice style.
  de FS: Tauchen in Griechenland? Schicker Stil.
  EN TP: dancing in Greece
  de TP: Tanzen in Griechenland
  EN FP: swimming in Greece
  de FP: Schwimmen in Griechenland
1116 | groom (noun): the man who is getting married at a wedding | loc: Bräutigam
  EN TS: The groom is carrying her.
  de TS: Der Bräutigam trägt sie.
  EN FS: The groom is carrying a cake.
  de FS: Der Bräutigam trägt eine Torte.
  EN TP: a groom carrying his bride
  de TP: ein Bräutigam trägt seine Braut
  EN FP: a groom brushing a horse
  de FP: ein Bräutigam striegelt ein Pferd
1119 | guide (noun): a person who shows tourists around a place | loc: Reiseführer
  EN TS: The guide is leading the tour.
  de TS: Der Reiseführer leitet die Tour.
  EN FS: The guide is leading the race.
  de FS: Der Reiseführer leitet das Rennen.
  EN TP: a guide with an umbrella
  de TP: ein Reiseführer mit Regenschirm
  EN FP: a mountain guide climbing
  de FP: ein Bergführer beim Klettern
1120 | guy (noun): a man, often a young one | loc: Typ
  EN TS: This guy is tossing his keys, so cool.
  de TS: Dieser Typ wirft seine Schlüssel hoch, voll cool.
  EN FS: This guy is tossing his phone, so cool.
  de FS: Dieser Typ wirft sein Handy hoch, voll cool.
  EN TP: a guy with a pizza
  de TP: ein Typ mit Pizza
  EN FP: a guy with a guitar
  de FP: ein Typ mit Gitarre
1123 | hallway (noun): a long narrow space with doors to rooms | loc: Flur
  EN TS: Her hallway is a dance floor!
  de TS: Ihr Flur ist eine Tanzfläche!
  EN FS: Her kitchen is a dance floor!
  de FS: Ihre Küche ist eine Tanzfläche!
  EN TP: dancing down a hallway
  de TP: durch den Flur tanzen
  EN FP: running down a hallway
  de FP: durch den Flur rennen
1125 | harbour (noun): a sheltered place on the coast for boats | loc: Hafen
  EN TS: Boats rest in the harbour.
  de TS: Boote ruhen im Hafen.
  EN FS: Boats rest on the beach.
  de FS: Boote ruhen am Strand.
  EN TP: boats in the harbour
  de TP: Boote im Hafen
  EN FP: boats in the canal
  de FP: Boote im Kanal
1126 | headache (noun): a pain in your head | loc: Kopfschmerzen
  EN TS: Work gave him a headache.
  de TS: Die Arbeit hat ihm Kopfschmerzen gemacht.
  EN FS: Music gave him a headache.
  de FS: Die Musik hat ihm Kopfschmerzen gemacht.
  EN TP: a headache at night
  de TP: Kopfschmerzen in der Nacht
  EN FP: a headache in the sun
  de FP: Kopfschmerzen in der Sonne
1127 | health (noun): the state of your body, being well and not ill | loc: Gesundheit
  EN TS: Pure health and happiness!
  de TS: Pure Gesundheit und Freude!
  EN FS: Pure rain and darkness!
  de FS: Purer Regen und Dunkelheit!
  EN TP: full of health and joy
  de TP: voller Gesundheit und Freude
  EN FP: a health check
  de FP: ein Gesundheitscheck
1129 | heart (noun): the muscular organ in your chest | loc: Herz
  EN TS: The doctor is holding a heart!
  de TS: Der Arzt hält ein Herz!
  EN FS: The doctor is holding a brain!
  de FS: Der Arzt hält ein Gehirn!
  EN TP: a model of a heart
  de TP: das Modell eines Herzens
  EN FP: a model of a brain
  de FP: das Modell eines Gehirns
1131 | heel (noun): the rounded back part of the foot | loc: Ferse
  EN TS: Both heels are off the floor.
  de TS: Beide Fersen heben vom Boden ab.
  EN FS: Both heels are on the floor.
  de FS: Beide Fersen stehen auf dem Boden.
  EN TP: lifting both heels
  de TP: beide Fersen anheben
  EN FP: wearing high heels
  de FP: High Heels tragen
1133 | helper (noun): a person who helps someone | loc: Helfer | translator note: female form Helferin (her bag)
  EN TS: The helper has her bag.
  de TS: Die Helferin hat ihre Tasche.
  EN FS: The helper has her dog.
  de FS: Die Helferin hat ihren Hund.
  EN TP: a helper with her bag
  de TP: eine Helferin mit ihrer Tasche
  EN FP: a helper in the kitchen
  de FP: eine Helferin in der Küche
1134 | hill (noun): a raised piece of land, smaller than a mountain | loc: Hügel
  EN TS: Guess who is having lunch on the hill? The sheep.
  de TS: Rate mal, wer auf dem Hügel zu Mittag isst? Die Schafe.
  EN FS: Guess who is having lunch on the hill? The cows.
  de FS: Rate mal, wer auf dem Hügel zu Mittag isst? Die Kühe.
  EN TP: a tree on the hill
  de TP: ein Baum auf dem Hügel
  EN FP: a house on the hill
  de FP: ein Haus auf dem Hügel
1135 | hip (noun): the part where the leg joins the waist | loc: Hüfte
  EN TS: Her hand is on her hip.
  de TS: Ihre Hand liegt auf ihrer Hüfte.
  EN FS: Her hand is on her head.
  de FS: Ihre Hand liegt auf ihrem Kopf.
  EN TP: a hand on her hip
  de TP: eine Hand auf der Hüfte
  EN FP: a hand on his shoulder
  de FP: eine Hand auf seiner Schulter
1136 | home (noun): the house or flat someone is living in | loc: Zuhause
  EN TS: He is finally home!
  de TS: Er ist endlich zuhause!
  EN FS: He is finally at work!
  de FS: Er ist endlich bei der Arbeit!
  EN TP: coming home with a bag
  de TP: mit einer Tasche zuhause ankommen
  EN FP: leaving home with a bag
  de FP: mit einer Tasche von zuhause weggehen
1138 | hospital (noun): a health facility where patients get treatment | loc: Krankenhaus
  EN TS: Quiet day at the hospital.
  de TS: Ruhiger Tag im Krankenhaus.
  EN FS: Quiet day at the airport.
  de FS: Ruhiger Tag am Flughafen.
  EN TP: a bright hospital corridor
  de TP: ein heller Krankenhausflur
  EN FP: a full hospital ward
  de FP: eine volle Krankenstation
1139 | host (noun): the person who invites guests and cares for them | loc: Gastgeber
  EN TS: The host is making a toast.
  de TS: Der Gastgeber bringt einen Toast aus.
  EN FS: The host is making a cake.
  de FS: Der Gastgeber backt einen Kuchen.
  EN TP: a host raising his glass
  de TP: ein Gastgeber hebt sein Glas
  EN FP: a TV show host
  de FP: ein TV-Moderator
1141 | hotel (noun): a building where travelers pay to stay | loc: Hotel
  EN TS: A guest is leaving the hotel.
  de TS: Ein Gast verlässt das Hotel.
  EN FS: A guest is entering the hotel.
  de FS: Ein Gast betritt das Hotel.
  EN TP: leaving a grand hotel
  de TP: ein Grandhotel verlassen
  EN FP: a hotel by the sea
  de FP: ein Hotel am Meer
1143 | human (noun): a person; a member of mankind | loc: Mensch
  EN TS: There's just one human here.
  de TS: Hier ist genau ein Mensch.
  EN FS: There's just one camel here.
  de FS: Hier ist genau ein Kamel.
  EN TP: one human in the desert
  de TP: ein Mensch in der Wüste
  EN FP: a crowd of humans
  de FP: eine Menschenmenge
1144 | hunter (noun): a person who hunts wild animals | loc: Jäger
  EN TS: The hunter is kneeling.
  de TS: Der Jäger kniet.
  EN FS: The hunter is running.
  de FS: Der Jäger rennt.
  EN TP: a hunter with binoculars
  de TP: ein Jäger mit Fernglas
  EN FP: a hunter with a rifle
  de FP: ein Jäger mit Gewehr
1147 | infection (noun): a sore red swelling caused by germs | loc: Infektion
  EN TS: His elbow has an infection.
  de TS: Sein Ellbogen hat eine Infektion.
  EN FS: His knee has an infection.
  de FS: Sein Knie hat eine Infektion.
  EN TP: an infection on the elbow
  de TP: eine Infektion am Ellbogen
  EN FP: an infection in the eye
  de FP: eine Infektion im Auge
1148 | injection (noun): medicine put into the body with a needle | loc: Injektion
  EN TS: The injection is ready. Run!
  de TS: Die Injektion ist bereit. Lauf!
  EN FS: The bandage is ready. Run!
  de FS: Der Verband ist bereit. Lauf!
  EN TP: a tray for an injection
  de TP: ein Tablett für eine Injektion
  EN FP: a tray ready for dinner
  de FP: ein Tablett fürs Abendessen
1149 | insomnia (noun): not being able to fall asleep at night | loc: Schlaflosigkeit
  EN TS: Insomnia: him versus the ceiling.
  de TS: Schlaflosigkeit: er gegen die Decke.
  EN FS: Insomnia: him versus the fridge.
  de FS: Schlaflosigkeit: er gegen den Kühlschrank.
  EN TP: insomnia in the night
  de TP: Schlaflosigkeit in der Nacht
  EN FP: insomnia before an exam
  de FP: Schlaflosigkeit vor einer Prüfung
1151 | iron (noun): the hot tool for pressing clothes smooth | loc: Bügeleisen
  EN TS: His iron is steaming.
  de TS: Sein Bügeleisen dampft.
  EN FS: His kettle is steaming.
  de FS: Sein Wasserkocher dampft.
  EN TP: a steaming iron
  de TP: ein dampfendes Bügeleisen
  EN FP: an iron gate
  de FP: ein eisernes Tor
1152 | ironing board (noun): a tall folding table for smoothing clothes flat | loc: Bügelbrett
  EN TS: An ironing board is going up.
  de TS: Ein Bügelbrett wird aufgestellt.
  EN FS: A beach chair is going up.
  de FS: Ein Liegestuhl wird aufgestellt.
  EN TP: setting up an ironing board
  de TP: ein Bügelbrett aufstellen
  EN FP: sitting on an ironing board
  de FP: auf einem Bügelbrett sitzen
1154 | journalist (noun): a person who writes or reports the news | loc: Journalist
  EN TS: The journalist wants answers.
  de TS: Der Journalist will Antworten.
  EN FS: The doctor wants answers.
  de FS: Der Arzt will Antworten.
  EN TP: a journalist with a recorder
  de TP: ein Journalist mit Aufnahmegerät
  EN FP: a journalist at a desk
  de FP: ein Journalist am Schreibtisch
1156 | jungle (noun): a thick tropical forest full of vines | loc: Dschungel
  EN TS: The parrot runs this jungle.
  de TS: Der Papagei regiert diesen Dschungel.
  EN FS: The monkey runs this jungle.
  de FS: Der Affe regiert diesen Dschungel.
  EN TP: a parrot in the jungle
  de TP: ein Papagei im Dschungel
  EN FP: a parrot in a cage
  de FP: ein Papagei im Käfig
1158 | kettle (noun): the pot you boil water in for tea or coffee | loc: Wasserkocher
  EN TS: Kettle water is hot. Who knew?
  de TS: Wasser aus dem Wasserkocher ist heiß. Wer hätte das gedacht?
  EN FS: Tap water is hot. Who knew?
  de FS: Wasser aus dem Hahn ist heiß. Wer hätte das gedacht?
  EN TP: pouring from a kettle
  de TP: aus dem Wasserkocher gießen
  EN FP: a kettle on the stove
  de FP: ein Wasserkocher auf dem Herd
1159 | key (noun): a small metal device that turns in a lock | loc: Schlüssel
  EN TS: Here is your room key.
  de TS: Hier ist Ihr Zimmerschlüssel.
  EN FS: Here is your car key.
  de FS: Hier ist Ihr Autoschlüssel.
  EN TP: a hotel room key
  de TP: ein Hotelzimmerschlüssel
  EN FP: a car key
  de FP: ein Autoschlüssel
1160 | kitchen (noun): a room equipped for preparing meals | loc: Küche
  EN TS: The kitchen is well equipped.
  de TS: Die Küche ist top ausgestattet.
  EN FS: The kitchen is almost empty.
  de FS: Die Küche ist fast leer.
  EN TP: a bright kitchen
  de TP: eine helle Küche
  EN FP: a dark kitchen
  de FP: eine dunkle Küche
1161 | knee (noun): the joint in the middle of your leg | loc: Knie
  EN TS: He is putting ice on his knee.
  de TS: Er kühlt sein Knie mit Eis.
  EN FS: He is putting ice on his head.
  de FS: Er kühlt seinen Kopf mit Eis.
  EN TP: ice on a bent knee
  de TP: Eis auf dem gebeugten Knie
  EN FP: down on one knee
  de FP: auf einem Knie kniend
1163 | lady (noun): a polite name for any woman | loc: Dame
  EN TS: The lady has white gloves on.
  de TS: Die Dame trägt weiße Handschuhe.
  EN FS: The lady has black gloves on.
  de FS: Die Dame trägt schwarze Handschuhe.
  EN TP: a lady on the stairs
  de TP: eine Dame auf der Treppe
  EN FP: a lady at the bar
  de FP: eine Dame an der Bar
1166 | lamp (noun): an artificial source of light | loc: Lampe
  EN TS: She is moving a big lamp.
  de TS: Sie verschiebt eine große Lampe.
  EN FS: She is moving a big plant.
  de FS: Sie verschiebt eine große Pflanze.
  EN TP: a lamp for the table
  de TP: eine Lampe für den Tisch
  EN FP: a lamp for the garden
  de FP: eine Lampe für den Garten
1167 | lawyer (noun): a person whose job is to practice law | loc: Anwalt
  EN TS: The lawyer has a lot of books.
  de TS: Der Anwalt hat viele Bücher.
  EN FS: The lawyer has a lot of cats.
  de FS: Der Anwalt hat viele Katzen.
  EN TP: a lawyer with a folder
  de TP: ein Anwalt mit Ordner
  EN FP: a lawyer in a courtroom
  de FP: ein Anwalt im Gerichtssaal
1170 | librarian (noun): a person whose job is looking after books | loc: Bibliothekar
  EN TS: The librarian is on a ladder.
  de TS: Der Bibliothekar steht auf einer Leiter.
  EN FS: The librarian is on a table.
  de FS: Der Bibliothekar steht auf einem Tisch.
  EN TP: a librarian on a ladder
  de TP: ein Bibliothekar auf der Leiter
  EN FP: a librarian at a computer
  de FP: ein Bibliothekar am Computer
1173 | lightning (noun): the bright electric flash in a storm sky | loc: Blitz
  EN TS: Lightning is hitting the sea!
  de TS: Ein Blitz schlägt ins Meer ein!
  EN FS: Lightning is hitting a tree!
  de FS: Ein Blitz schlägt in einen Baum ein!
  EN TP: lightning over the sea
  de TP: Blitze über dem Meer
  EN FP: lightning over a city
  de FP: Blitze über einer Stadt
1175 | living room (noun): the room in a home where people sit and relax | loc: Wohnzimmer
  EN TS: Popcorn is flying all over the living room.
  de TS: Popcorn fliegt durchs ganze Wohnzimmer.
  EN FS: Popcorn is flying all over the kitchen.
  de FS: Popcorn fliegt durch die ganze Küche.
  EN TP: friends in a living room
  de TP: Freunde im Wohnzimmer
  EN FP: friends in a waiting room
  de FP: Freunde im Wartezimmer
1178 | loser (noun): the person or team that does not win | loc: Verlierer
  EN TS: The loser is under a towel.
  de TS: Der Verlierer versteckt sich unter einem Handtuch.
  EN FS: The loser is under a table.
  de FS: Der Verlierer versteckt sich unter einem Tisch.
  EN TP: the loser of the match
  de TP: der Verlierer des Spiels
  EN FP: the loser of the race
  de FP: der Verlierer des Rennens
1179 | luggage (noun): bags you carry your things in when traveling | loc: Gepäck
  EN TS: Too much luggage for one man.
  de TS: Zu viel Gepäck für einen Mann.
  EN FS: Too much luggage for one girl.
  de FS: Zu viel Gepäck für ein Mädchen.
  EN TP: a trolley full of luggage
  de TP: ein Wagen voller Gepäck
  EN FP: luggage on a car roof
  de FP: Gepäck auf dem Autodach
1180 | luggage tag (noun): a small label tied to a suitcase | loc: Kofferanhänger
  EN TS: The luggage tag is blank.
  de TS: Der Kofferanhänger ist leer.
  EN FS: The luggage tag is red.
  de FS: Der Kofferanhänger ist rot.
  EN TP: tying on a luggage tag
  de TP: einen Kofferanhänger anbinden
  EN FP: cutting off a luggage tag
  de FP: einen Kofferanhänger abschneiden
1182 | maid (noun): a woman whose job is cleaning hotel rooms | loc: Zimmermädchen
  EN TS: The maid is making the bed.
  de TS: Das Zimmermädchen macht das Bett.
  EN FS: The maid is making coffee.
  de FS: Das Zimmermädchen macht Kaffee.
  EN TP: a maid making a bed
  de TP: ein Zimmermädchen macht das Bett
  EN FP: a maid at a wedding
  de FP: ein Zimmermädchen auf einer Hochzeit
1183 | male (adjective): being a man or a boy | loc: männlich
  EN TS: A male athlete is rowing.
  de TS: Ein männlicher Sportler rudert.
  EN FS: A female athlete is rowing.
  de FS: Eine weibliche Sportlerin rudert.
  EN TP: a male rower
  de TP: ein männlicher Ruderer
  EN FP: a male swimmer
  de FP: ein männlicher Schwimmer
1185 | manager (noun): the person in charge who tells a team what to do | loc: Manager
  EN TS: The manager is giving orders.
  de TS: Der Manager verteilt Aufgaben.
  EN FS: The manager is giving gifts.
  de FS: Der Manager verteilt Geschenke.
  EN TP: a manager with a laptop
  de TP: ein Manager mit Laptop
  EN FP: a manager with a phone
  de FP: ein Manager mit Handy
1188 | married (adjective): having a husband or wife | loc: verheiratet
  EN TS: They just got married and are already dancing.
  de TS: Frisch verheiratet und schon tanzen sie.
  EN FS: They just got married and are already fighting.
  de FS: Frisch verheiratet und schon streiten sie.
  EN TP: a married couple dancing
  de TP: ein verheiratetes Paar tanzt
  EN FP: a married couple arguing
  de FP: ein verheiratetes Paar streitet
1189 | mattress (noun): the thick soft part of a bed you lie on | loc: Matratze
  EN TS: They are carrying a mattress.
  de TS: Sie tragen eine Matratze.
  EN FS: They are carrying a piano.
  de FS: Sie tragen ein Klavier.
  EN TP: a mattress up the stairs
  de TP: eine Matratze die Treppe hoch
  EN FP: a mattress on the floor
  de FP: eine Matratze auf dem Boden
1193 | medicine (noun): something you take that treats an illness | loc: Medizin
  EN TS: Open wide for the medicine.
  de TS: Mund auf für die Medizin.
  EN FS: Open wide for the ice cream.
  de FS: Mund auf für das Eis.
  EN TP: liquid medicine on a spoon
  de TP: flüssige Medizin auf dem Löffel
  EN FP: medicine in a pill box
  de FP: Medizin in einer Pillendose
1195 | mexican (adjective): from the country south of the United States | loc: mexikanisch
  EN TS: A flying Mexican tortilla!
  de TS: Eine fliegende mexikanische Tortilla!
  EN FS: A flying Mexican taco!
  de FS: Ein fliegender mexikanischer Taco!
  EN TP: a Mexican street stall
  de TP: ein mexikanischer Straßenstand
  EN FP: a Mexican restaurant
  de FP: ein mexikanisches Restaurant
1198 | model (noun): a person who poses for a photographer | loc: Model
  EN TS: The model owns the runway.
  de TS: Das Model rockt den Laufsteg.
  EN FS: The model owns the beach.
  de FS: Das Model rockt den Strand.
  EN TP: a model on a runway
  de TP: ein Model auf dem Laufsteg
  EN FP: a model of a plane
  de FP: das Modell eines Flugzeugs
1200 | morning (noun): the time between dawn and noon | loc: Morgen
  EN TS: She loves this sunny morning.
  de TS: Sie liebt diesen sonnigen Morgen.
  EN FS: She loves this rainy morning.
  de FS: Sie liebt diesen regnerischen Morgen.
  EN TP: a sunny morning
  de TP: ein sonniger Morgen
  EN FP: a rainy morning
  de FP: ein regnerischer Morgen
1202 | mother (noun): a woman who has given birth to a child | loc: Mutter
  EN TS: Mother and baby: nose to nose.
  de TS: Mutter und Baby: Nase an Nase.
  EN FS: Mother and dog: nose to nose.
  de FS: Mutter und Hund: Nase an Nase.
  EN TP: a mother lifting her baby
  de TP: eine Mutter hebt ihr Baby hoch
  EN FP: a mother feeding her baby
  de FP: eine Mutter füttert ihr Baby
1203 | motorbike (noun): a two-wheeled motor vehicle you ride | loc: Motorrad
  EN TS: His motorbike is sparking!
  de TS: Sein Motorrad sprüht Funken!
  EN FS: His scooter is sparking!
  de FS: Sein Roller sprüht Funken!
  EN TP: a motorbike in a curve
  de TP: ein Motorrad in der Kurve
  EN FP: a motorbike in a garage
  de FP: ein Motorrad in der Garage
1206 | mud (noun): soft wet earth, soil soaked with water | loc: Schlamm
  EN TS: Mud is flying everywhere!
  de TS: Überall fliegt Schlamm!
  EN FS: Snow is flying everywhere!
  de FS: Überall fliegt Schnee!
  EN TP: a shoe in deep mud
  de TP: ein Schuh in tiefem Schlamm
  EN FP: a shoe in fresh snow
  de FP: ein Schuh in frischem Schnee
1208 | museum (noun): a building for displaying valuable old objects | loc: Museum
  EN TS: A dinosaur in the museum!
  de TS: Ein Dinosaurier im Museum!
  EN FS: A whale in the museum!
  de FS: Ein Wal im Museum!
  EN TP: a dinosaur in a museum
  de TP: ein Dinosaurier im Museum
  EN FP: a museum of modern art
  de FP: ein Museum für moderne Kunst
1211 | nation (noun): a large group who share a country and an identity | loc: Nation
  EN TS: A whole nation singing as one.
  de TS: Eine ganze Nation singt im Einklang.
  EN FS: A whole nation dancing as one.
  de FS: Eine ganze Nation tanzt im Einklang.
  EN TP: a nation singing together
  de TP: eine Nation singt gemeinsam
  EN FP: a nation of coffee lovers
  de FP: eine Nation von Kaffeeliebhabern
1213 | nausea (noun): the sick feeling that you may vomit | loc: Übelkeit
  EN TS: Big waves, big nausea.
  de TS: Große Wellen, große Übelkeit.
  EN FS: Small waves, big nausea.
  de FS: Kleine Wellen, große Übelkeit.
  EN TP: nausea on a rough sea
  de TP: Übelkeit auf rauer See
  EN FP: nausea after a big meal
  de FP: Übelkeit nach einem großen Essen
1214 | neck (noun): the part that connects the head to the body | loc: Hals
  EN TS: She is stretching her neck.
  de TS: Sie dehnt ihren Hals.
  EN FS: She is stretching her leg.
  de FS: Sie dehnt ihr Bein.
  EN TP: a long stretched neck
  de TP: ein lang gestreckter Hals
  EN FP: a scarf around the neck
  de FP: ein Schal um den Hals
1215 | neighbor (noun): a person who lives next door or near you | loc: Nachbar
  EN TS: The neighbors are chatting.
  de TS: Die Nachbarn plaudern.
  EN FS: The neighbors are fighting.
  de FS: Die Nachbarn streiten.
  EN TP: neighbors at the garden fence
  de TP: Nachbarn am Gartenzaun
  EN FP: a noisy neighbor
  de FP: ein lauter Nachbar
1216 | netherlands (noun): a flat country in Europe with tulips and windmills | loc: die Niederlande
  EN TS: Bike, tulips, windmills. Yes, the Netherlands.
  de TS: Fahrrad, Tulpen, Windmühlen. Ja, die Niederlande.
  EN FS: Car, tulips, windmills. Yes, the Netherlands.
  de FS: Auto, Tulpen, Windmühlen. Ja, die Niederlande.
  EN TP: tulips in the Netherlands
  de TP: Tulpen in den Niederlanden
  EN FP: a market in the Netherlands
  de FP: ein Markt in den Niederlanden
1218 | no one (phrase): not a single person | loc: niemand
  EN TS: No one is on the playground. Creepy!
  de TS: Niemand ist auf dem Spielplatz. Gruselig!
  EN FS: Kids are on the playground. Creepy!
  de FS: Kinder sind auf dem Spielplatz. Gruselig!
  EN TP: no one on the swings
  de TP: niemand auf den Schaukeln
  EN FP: no one on the beach
  de FP: niemand am Strand
1219 | nobody (phrase): not any person at all | loc: niemand
  EN TS: Nobody came. Great party.
  de TS: Niemand ist gekommen. Tolle Party.
  EN FS: Everybody came. Great party.
  de FS: Alle sind gekommen. Tolle Party.
  EN TP: nobody at the table
  de TP: niemand am Tisch
  EN FP: a crowded dinner table
  de FP: ein voller Esstisch
1221 | officer (noun): a person who holds a position of authority | loc: Offizier
  EN TS: The officer is saluting.
  de TS: Der Offizier salutiert.
  EN FS: The officer is dancing.
  de FS: Der Offizier tanzt.
  EN TP: an officer saluting
  de TP: ein salutierender Offizier
  EN FP: an officer driving
  de FP: ein Offizier am Steuer
1225 | painter (noun): a person who puts colour on walls as a job | loc: Maler
  EN TS: The painter really loves teal.
  de TS: Der Maler steht voll auf Petrol.
  EN FS: The painter really loves pink.
  de FS: Der Maler steht voll auf Pink.
  EN TP: a painter on a ladder
  de TP: ein Maler auf der Leiter
  EN FP: a painter at an easel
  de FP: ein Maler an der Staffelei
1227 | parent (noun): a father or mother of a child | loc: Elternteil
  EN TS: Parent mode: jogging.
  de TS: Elternteil-Modus: Joggen.
  EN FS: Parent mode: sleeping.
  de FS: Elternteil-Modus: Schlafen.
  EN TP: a parent beside a bike
  de TP: ein Elternteil neben einem Fahrrad
  EN FP: a parent fixing a bike
  de FP: ein Elternteil repariert ein Fahrrad
1230 | passenger (noun): a traveler riding in a vehicle, not driving it | loc: Fahrgast
  EN TS: The passenger is fast asleep.
  de TS: Der Fahrgast schläft tief und fest.
  EN FS: The passenger is wide awake.
  de FS: Der Fahrgast ist hellwach.
  EN TP: a sleeping train passenger
  de TP: ein schlafender Fahrgast im Zug
  EN FP: a passenger in a taxi
  de FP: ein Fahrgast im Taxi
1232 | patient (noun): a person who needs medical care | loc: Patient
  EN TS: The patient is breathing in.
  de TS: Der Patient atmet ein.
  EN FS: The patient is eating lunch.
  de FS: Der Patient isst zu Mittag.
  EN TP: a patient breathing deeply
  de TP: ein Patient atmet tief ein
  EN FP: a patient in bed
  de FP: ein Patient im Bett
1233 | pedestrian (noun): a person walking in the street, not driving | loc: Fußgänger
  EN TS: The pedestrian has a coffee.
  de TS: Der Fußgänger hat einen Kaffee.
  EN FS: The pedestrian has a dog.
  de FS: Der Fußgänger hat einen Hund.
  EN TP: a pedestrian with coffee
  de TP: ein Fußgänger mit Kaffee
  EN FP: a pedestrian bridge
  de FP: eine Fußgängerbrücke
1235 | people (noun): any group of human beings together | loc: Menschen
  EN TS: People are cheering!
  de TS: Die Menschen jubeln!
  EN FS: People are crying!
  de FS: Die Menschen weinen!
  EN TP: people cheering at night
  de TP: jubelnde Menschen in der Nacht
  EN FP: people cheering in a stadium
  de FP: jubelnde Menschen im Stadion
1237 | person (noun): a man, woman or child | loc: Person
  EN TS: Such a "busy" crossing: one person.
  de TS: So eine „belebte“ Kreuzung: eine Person.
  EN FS: Such a "busy" crossing: one dog.
  de FS: So eine „belebte“ Kreuzung: ein Hund.
  EN TP: one person on the crosswalk
  de TP: eine Person auf dem Zebrastreifen
  EN FP: one person on the bus
  de FP: eine Person im Bus
1238 | pharmacy (noun): a shop where you buy medicine | loc: Apotheke
  EN TS: The pharmacy has lots of jars.
  de TS: Die Apotheke hat jede Menge Gläser.
  EN FS: The pharmacy has lots of toys.
  de FS: Die Apotheke hat jede Menge Spielzeug.
  EN TP: a cozy old pharmacy
  de TP: eine gemütliche alte Apotheke
  EN FP: a red cross pharmacy
  de FP: eine Apotheke mit rotem Kreuz
1241 | photographer (noun): someone who takes photos as their job | loc: Fotograf
  EN TS: The photographer is lying in the wet street!
  de TS: Der Fotograf liegt auf der nassen Straße!
  EN FS: The photographer is standing in the wet street!
  de FS: Der Fotograf steht auf der nassen Straße!
  EN TP: a photographer on the ground
  de TP: ein Fotograf am Boden
  EN FP: a photographer in a studio
  de FP: ein Fotograf im Studio
1242 | picture (noun): a photo or drawing, often in a frame | loc: Bild
  EN TS: She is hanging a picture.
  de TS: Sie hängt ein Bild auf.
  EN FS: She is hanging a mirror.
  de FS: Sie hängt einen Spiegel auf.
  EN TP: a picture on the wall
  de TP: ein Bild an der Wand
  EN FP: a picture on her phone
  de FP: ein Bild auf ihrem Handy
1248 | planet (noun): a large round world that circles a star | loc: Planet
  EN TS: The planet has rings!
  de TS: Der Planet hat Ringe!
  EN FS: The planet has no rings!
  de FS: Der Planet hat keine Ringe!
  EN TP: a ringed planet
  de TP: ein Planet mit Ringen
  EN FP: a planet on a map
  de FP: ein Planet auf einer Karte
1254 | plumber (noun): a worker who fixes pipes and sinks | loc: Klempner
  EN TS: The plumber is fixing a pipe.
  de TS: Der Klempner repariert ein Rohr.
  EN FS: The plumber is fixing a door.
  de FS: Der Klempner repariert eine Tür.
  EN TP: a plumber under a sink
  de TP: ein Klempner unter dem Waschbecken
  EN FP: a plumber on a roof
  de FP: ein Klempner auf dem Dach
1255 | poland (noun): a country in central Europe, east of Germany | loc: Polen
  EN TS: It is winter in Poland.
  de TS: In Polen ist Winter.
  EN FS: It is summer in Poland.
  de FS: In Polen ist Sommer.
  EN TP: a snowy square in Poland
  de TP: ein verschneiter Platz in Polen
  EN FP: a sandy beach in Poland
  de FP: ein Sandstrand in Polen
1256 | police officer (noun): a person in uniform who makes people obey the law | loc: Polizist
  EN TS: The police officer is smiling.
  de TS: Der Polizist lächelt.
  EN FS: The police officer is crying.
  de FS: Der Polizist weint.
  EN TP: a police officer pointing
  de TP: ein zeigender Polizist
  EN FP: a police officer running
  de FP: ein rennender Polizist
1258 | polish (adjective): from Poland or connected to its people | loc: polnisch
  EN TS: She made Polish dumplings.
  de TS: Sie hat polnische Piroggen gemacht.
  EN FS: She made Polish sausages.
  de FS: Sie hat polnische Würste gemacht.
  EN TP: Polish dumplings in rows
  de TP: polnische Piroggen in Reihen
  EN FP: Polish sausages on a grill
  de FP: polnische Würste auf dem Grill
1260 | portugal (noun): a country in the far west of Europe, next to Spain | loc: Portugal
  EN TS: She is running in Portugal.
  de TS: Sie joggt in Portugal.
  EN FS: She is cycling in Portugal.
  de FS: Sie radelt in Portugal.
  EN TP: running in Portugal
  de TP: Joggen in Portugal
  EN FP: riding a tram in Portugal
  de FP: Straßenbahnfahren in Portugal
1262 | portuguese (adjective): from Portugal or connected to its people | loc: portugiesisch
  EN TS: Cinnamon on Portuguese tarts!
  de TS: Zimt auf portugiesischen Törtchen!
  EN FS: Chocolate on Portuguese tarts!
  de FS: Schokolade auf portugiesischen Törtchen!
  EN TP: Portuguese custard tarts
  de TP: portugiesische Puddingtörtchen
  EN FP: Portuguese sardines
  de FP: portugiesische Sardinen
1263 | postman (noun): a person whose job is to bring letters to houses | loc: Briefträger
  EN TS: The postman is delivering letters.
  de TS: Der Briefträger bringt Briefe.
  EN FS: The postman is delivering pizzas.
  de FS: Der Briefträger bringt Pizzen.
  EN TP: a postman at a door
  de TP: ein Briefträger an der Tür
  EN FP: a postman in a van
  de FP: ein Briefträger im Lieferwagen
1266 | president (noun): the leader of a country or a big company | loc: Präsident
  EN TS: The president is speaking and the cameras are flashing!
  de TS: Der Präsident spricht und die Kameras blitzen!
  EN FS: The president is singing and the cameras are flashing!
  de FS: Der Präsident singt und die Kameras blitzen!
  EN TP: a president giving a speech
  de TP: ein Präsident hält eine Rede
  EN FP: a president shaking hands
  de FP: ein Präsident schüttelt Hände
1267 | professional (adjective): smart and serious in the way you work or look | loc: professionell
  EN TS: She looks very professional.
  de TS: Sie sieht sehr professionell aus.
  EN FS: She looks very sleepy.
  de FS: Sie sieht sehr müde aus.
  EN TP: a professional look
  de TP: ein professioneller Look
  EN FP: a professional athlete
  de FP: ein professioneller Sportler
1268 | professor (noun): a teacher of the highest rank at a university | loc: Professor
  EN TS: The professor is lecturing.
  de TS: Der Professor hält eine Vorlesung.
  EN FS: The professor is sleeping.
  de FS: Der Professor schläft.
  EN TP: a professor lecturing
  de TP: ein Professor bei der Vorlesung
  EN FP: a professor's office
  de FP: das Büro eines Professors
1270 | puddle (noun): a small pool of rain water on the ground | loc: Pfütze
  EN TS: She is stomping in a puddle.
  de TS: Sie stampft in eine Pfütze.
  EN FS: She is stomping in the snow.
  de FS: Sie stampft in den Schnee.
  EN TP: stomping into a puddle
  de TP: in eine Pfütze springen
  EN FP: a puddle of spilled milk
  de FP: eine Pfütze verschütteter Milch
1274 | rainbow (noun): an arc of colours in the sky after a shower | loc: Regenbogen
  EN TS: A huge rainbow over the hills.
  de TS: Ein riesiger Regenbogen über den Hügeln.
  EN FS: A huge rainbow over the sea.
  de FS: Ein riesiger Regenbogen über dem Meer.
  EN TP: a rainbow over green hills
  de TP: ein Regenbogen über grünen Hügeln
  EN FP: a rainbow over a city
  de FP: ein Regenbogen über einer Stadt
1275 | rash (noun): red itchy spots on the skin | loc: Ausschlag
  EN TS: He is scratching his rash.
  de TS: Er kratzt an seinem Ausschlag.
  EN FS: He is scratching his head.
  de FS: Er kratzt sich am Kopf.
  EN TP: scratching a red rash
  de TP: einen roten Ausschlag kratzen
  EN FP: a rash on his face
  de FP: ein Ausschlag im Gesicht
1278 | reception (noun): the front desk where guests check in | loc: Rezeption
  EN TS: Reception has a brass bell.
  de TS: Die Rezeption hat eine Messingglocke.
  EN FS: Reception has a brass lamp.
  de FS: Die Rezeption hat eine Messinglampe.
  EN TP: a key at reception
  de TP: ein Schlüssel an der Rezeption
  EN FP: a wedding reception
  de FP: ein Hochzeitsempfang
1286 | roof (noun): the protective covering on top of a building | loc: Dach
  EN TS: A worker is clearing the roof.
  de TS: Ein Arbeiter räumt das Dach frei.
  EN FS: A worker is painting the roof.
  de FS: Ein Arbeiter streicht das Dach.
  EN TP: a tiled house roof
  de TP: ein Hausdach mit Ziegeln
  EN FP: a glass station roof
  de FP: ein gläsernes Bahnhofsdach
1287 | room (noun): a space inside a building with walls and a floor | loc: Zimmer
  EN TS: An empty room? Time to dance!
  de TS: Leeres Zimmer? Zeit zu tanzen!
  EN FS: An empty shop? Time to dance!
  de FS: Leerer Laden? Zeit zu tanzen!
  EN TP: an empty sunny room
  de TP: ein leeres, sonniges Zimmer
  EN FP: an empty sunny beach
  de FP: ein leerer, sonniger Strand
1290 | route (noun): the way you follow to get somewhere | loc: Route
  EN TS: This route has so many bends!
  de TS: Diese Route hat so viele Kurven!
  EN FS: This route has so many trucks!
  de FS: Diese Route hat so viele Lkw!
  EN TP: a route up the mountain
  de TP: eine Route den Berg hinauf
  EN FP: a route along the coast
  de FP: eine Route entlang der Küste
1299 | scan (noun): a medical picture of the inside of your body | loc: Scan
  EN TS: He loves his scan, apparently.
  de TS: Er liebt seinen Scan. Angeblich.
  EN FS: He hates his scan, apparently.
  de FS: Er hasst seinen Scan. Angeblich.
  EN TP: a patient having a scan
  de TP: ein Patient beim Scan
  EN FP: a scan at the airport
  de FP: ein Scan am Flughafen
1303 | scooter (noun): a light motorbike with a small engine | loc: Motorroller
  EN TS: What a stylish scooter ride!
  de TS: Was für eine stylische Fahrt mit dem Motorroller!
  EN FS: What a stylish bicycle ride!
  de FS: Was für eine stylische Fahrt mit dem Fahrrad!
  EN TP: a scooter in Italy
  de TP: ein Motorroller in Italien
  EN FP: a scooter on the beach
  de FP: ein Motorroller am Strand
1304 | secretary (noun): a person who answers calls and does office work | loc: Sekretär
  EN TS: The secretary is very busy!
  de TS: Der Sekretär ist total beschäftigt!
  EN FS: The secretary is very bored!
  de FS: Der Sekretär ist total gelangweilt!
  EN TP: a busy secretary
  de TP: ein beschäftigter Sekretär
  EN FP: a secretary on holiday
  de FP: ein Sekretär im Urlaub
1305 | seed (noun): the small hard part that grows into a plant | loc: Samen
  EN TS: A bean seed is falling.
  de TS: Ein Bohnensamen fällt.
  EN FS: A small stone is falling.
  de FS: Ein kleiner Stein fällt.
  EN TP: planting a bean seed
  de TP: einen Bohnensamen pflanzen
  EN FP: a bird eating seeds
  de FP: ein Vogel frisst Samen
1306 | seller (noun): someone who exchanges goods for money | loc: Verkäufer
  EN TS: The seller is very happy.
  de TS: Der Verkäufer ist super glücklich.
  EN FS: The seller is very angry.
  de FS: Der Verkäufer ist super wütend.
  EN TP: a vegetable seller
  de TP: ein Gemüseverkäufer
  EN FP: a book seller
  de FP: ein Buchverkäufer
1307 | servant (noun): a person paid to work in someone's house | loc: Diener
  EN TS: The servant has a silver tray.
  de TS: Der Diener hat ein Silbertablett.
  EN FS: The servant has a silver bell.
  de FS: Der Diener hat eine Silberglocke.
  EN TP: a servant with a tray
  de TP: ein Diener mit Tablett
  EN FP: a servant in a kitchen
  de FP: ein Diener in der Küche
1308 | shadow (noun): the dark shape you make by blocking light | loc: Schatten
  EN TS: Even her shadow is dancing!
  de TS: Sogar ihr Schatten tanzt!
  EN FS: Even her friend is dancing!
  de FS: Sogar ihre Freundin tanzt!
  EN TP: a giant wall shadow
  de TP: ein riesiger Schatten an der Wand
  EN FP: a shadow under a tree
  de FP: ein Schatten unter einem Baum
1311 | ship (noun): a large vessel that carries passengers or goods | loc: Schiff
  EN TS: She is waving at a huge ship!
  de TS: Sie winkt einem riesigen Schiff!
  EN FS: She is waving at a tiny ship!
  de FS: Sie winkt einem winzigen Schiff!
  EN TP: waving at a big ship
  de TP: einem großen Schiff zuwinken
  EN FP: waving from a big ship
  de FP: von einem großen Schiff winken
1312 | shop assistant (noun): a person who helps customers in a store | loc: Verkäuferin
  EN TS: The shop assistant has a coat.
  de TS: Die Verkäuferin hat einen Mantel.
  EN FS: The shop assistant has a hat.
  de FS: Die Verkäuferin hat einen Hut.
  EN TP: a shop assistant at work
  de TP: eine Verkäuferin bei der Arbeit
  EN FP: a shop assistant on break
  de FP: eine Verkäuferin in der Pause
1314 | shoulder (noun): the body part between the neck and the arm | loc: Schulter
  EN TS: Her shoulder needs a check.
  de TS: Ihre Schulter muss untersucht werden.
  EN FS: Her knee needs a check.
  de FS: Ihr Knie muss untersucht werden.
  EN TP: examining a shoulder
  de TP: eine Schulter untersuchen
  EN FP: a bag on her shoulder
  de FP: eine Tasche auf ihrer Schulter
1315 | shower (noun): a fixture that sprays water over you | loc: Dusche
  EN TS: Rain shower? More like a waterfall!
  de TS: Regendusche? Eher ein Wasserfall!
  EN FS: Garden shower? More like a waterfall!
  de FS: Gartendusche? Eher ein Wasserfall!
  EN TP: a big rain shower
  de TP: eine große Regendusche
  EN FP: a shower curtain
  de FP: ein Duschvorhang
1316 | sibling (noun): your brother or your sister | loc: Geschwisterteil | translator note: plural siblings = Geschwister; Geschwisterteil unnatural here
  EN TS: The siblings are laughing.
  de TS: Die Geschwister lachen.
  EN FS: The siblings are arguing.
  de FS: Die Geschwister streiten.
  EN TP: siblings laughing together
  de TP: Geschwister lachen zusammen
  EN FP: siblings fighting over a toy
  de FP: Geschwister streiten um ein Spielzeug
1317 | sidewalk (noun): the paved path beside a road where people walk | loc: Bürgersteig
  EN TS: He is on a stone sidewalk.
  de TS: Er steht auf einem steinernen Bürgersteig.
  EN FS: He is on a wooden sidewalk.
  de FS: Er steht auf einem hölzernen Bürgersteig.
  EN TP: a wide stone sidewalk
  de TP: ein breiter Bürgersteig aus Stein
  EN FP: a sidewalk full of people
  de FP: ein Bürgersteig voller Menschen
1319 | single (adjective): not married or in a relationship | loc: Single
  EN TS: She is single and happy.
  de TS: Sie ist Single und glücklich.
  EN FS: She is single and sad.
  de FS: Sie ist Single und traurig.
  EN TP: happy being single
  de TP: glücklich als Single
  EN FP: a single cup of tea
  de FP: eine einzelne Tasse Tee
1321 | sir (noun): a polite word for talking to a man | loc: mein Herr
  EN TS: Here is your dish, sir.
  de TS: Ihr Gericht, mein Herr.
  EN FS: Here is your bill, sir.
  de FS: Ihre Rechnung, mein Herr.
  EN TP: your dish, sir
  de TP: Ihr Gericht, mein Herr
  EN FP: your bill, sir
  de FP: Ihre Rechnung, mein Herr
1323 | skyscraper (noun): a very tall building with many floors | loc: Wolkenkratzer
  EN TS: What a tall skyscraper!
  de TS: Was für ein hoher Wolkenkratzer!
  EN FS: What a tall lighthouse!
  de FS: Was für ein hoher Leuchtturm!
  EN TP: gazing up at a skyscraper
  de TP: zu einem Wolkenkratzer hochschauen
  EN FP: gazing down from a skyscraper
  de FP: von einem Wolkenkratzer runterschauen
1325 | sleep (verb): to be asleep | loc: schlafen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is sleeping. The pillow is her friend.
  de TS: Sie schläft. Das Kissen ist ihr Freund.
  EN FS: She is sleeping. The cat is her friend.
  de FS: Sie schläft. Die Katze ist ihr Freund.
  EN TP: sleeping on a bed
  de TP: auf einem Bett schlafen
  EN FP: sleeping on a train
  de FP: im Zug schlafen
1326 | slippers (noun): soft warm shoes worn inside the house | loc: Hausschuhe
  EN TS: Fluffy slippers, lazy morning.
  de TS: Flauschige Hausschuhe, fauler Morgen.
  EN FS: Fluffy socks, lazy morning.
  de FS: Flauschige Socken, fauler Morgen.
  EN TP: putting on fluffy slippers
  de TP: flauschige Hausschuhe anziehen
  EN FP: fluffy slippers in a shop
  de FP: flauschige Hausschuhe im Laden
1327 | slovak (adjective): from or belonging to the country east of Czechia | loc: slowakisch
  EN TS: He wears Slovak folk clothes.
  de TS: Er trägt slowakische Tracht.
  EN FS: She wears Slovak folk clothes.
  de FS: Sie trägt slowakische Tracht.
  EN TP: Slovak folk dress
  de TP: slowakische Tracht
  EN FP: a Slovak football shirt
  de FP: ein slowakisches Fußballtrikot
1328 | slovakia (noun): a small central European country next to Austria | loc: die Slowakei
  EN TS: She is dancing in Slovakia!
  de TS: Sie tanzt in der Slowakei!
  EN FS: She is swimming in Slovakia!
  de FS: Sie schwimmt in der Slowakei!
  EN TP: a meadow in Slovakia
  de TP: eine Wiese in der Slowakei
  EN FP: a beach in Slovakia
  de FP: ein Strand in der Slowakei
1337 | sofa (noun): a long soft seat for more than one person | loc: Sofa
  EN TS: They are playing on the sofa.
  de TS: Sie spielen auf dem Sofa.
  EN FS: They are playing on the floor.
  de FS: Sie spielen auf dem Boden.
  EN TP: friends on a grey sofa
  de TP: Freunde auf einem grauen Sofa
  EN FP: friends on a grey bus
  de FP: Freunde in einem grauen Bus
1340 | somebody (noun): a person, when you don't say who | loc: jemand
  EN TS: Somebody is leaving in secret.
  de TS: Jemand haut heimlich ab.
  EN FS: Somebody is dancing in secret.
  de FS: Jemand tanzt heimlich.
  EN TP: somebody walking away
  de TP: jemand geht weg
  EN FP: somebody walking a dog
  de FP: jemand führt einen Hund aus
1342 | son (noun): a male child of his parents | loc: Sohn
  EN TS: His son is back home!
  de TS: Sein Sohn ist wieder zu Hause!
  EN FS: His daughter is back home!
  de FS: Seine Tochter ist wieder zu Hause!
  EN TP: hugging his adult son
  de TP: seinen erwachsenen Sohn umarmen
  EN FP: waving goodbye to his son
  de FP: seinem Sohn zum Abschied winken
1344 | spider (noun): a small creature with eight legs that makes webs | loc: Spinne
  EN TS: The spider is at work.
  de TS: Die Spinne ist bei der Arbeit.
  EN FS: The ant is at work.
  de FS: Die Ameise ist bei der Arbeit.
  EN TP: a spider in its web
  de TP: eine Spinne in ihrem Netz
  EN FP: a spider in the bath
  de FP: eine Spinne in der Badewanne
1346 | spit (verb): to force water or saliva out of your mouth | loc: spucken
  EN TS: The boxer is spitting water.
  de TS: Der Boxer spuckt Wasser.
  EN FS: The boxer is drinking water.
  de FS: Der Boxer trinkt Wasser.
  EN TP: spitting water into a bucket
  de TP: Wasser in einen Eimer spucken
  EN FP: spitting out chewing gum
  de FP: Kaugummi ausspucken
1347 | sponge (noun): a soft object with holes used for washing | loc: Schwamm | translator note: sponge cake pun does not work in German
  EN TS: A hand is squeezing a sponge.
  de TS: Eine Hand drückt einen Schwamm aus.
  EN FS: A hand is squeezing a lemon.
  de FS: Eine Hand drückt eine Zitrone aus.
  EN TP: a squeezed soapy sponge
  de TP: ein ausgedrückter Seifenschwamm
  EN FP: a sponge cake
  de FP: ein Naturschwamm im Meer
1350 | square (noun): an open space in a town with buildings around it | loc: Platz
  EN TS: She is crossing the square. Bye, pigeons!
  de TS: Sie überquert den Platz. Tschüss, Tauben!
  EN FS: She is crossing the river. Bye, pigeons!
  de FS: Sie überquert den Fluss. Tschüss, Tauben!
  EN TP: running across a square
  de TP: über einen Platz rennen
  EN FP: sitting in a quiet square
  de FP: auf einem ruhigen Platz sitzen
1353 | star (noun): a body of hot gases that shines in the sky | loc: Stern
  EN TS: One bright star. Make a wish!
  de TS: Ein heller Stern. Wünsch dir was!
  EN FS: One bright moon. Make a wish!
  de FS: Ein heller Mond. Wünsch dir was!
  EN TP: pointing at a bright star
  de TP: auf einen hellen Stern zeigen
  EN FP: a star on a tree
  de FP: ein Stern auf dem Baum
1354 | station (noun): a place with special equipment for one purpose | loc: Bahnhof
  EN TS: Late again at the station!
  de TS: Schon wieder zu spät am Bahnhof!
  EN FS: Late again at the airport!
  de FS: Schon wieder zu spät am Flughafen!
  EN TP: hurrying through a station
  de TP: durch einen Bahnhof hetzen
  EN FP: sleeping at the station
  de FP: am Bahnhof schlafen
1355 | steering wheel (noun): the round thing you turn to drive a car | loc: Lenkrad
  EN TS: Hands on the steering wheel.
  de TS: Hände am Lenkrad.
  EN FS: Hands on the phone.
  de FS: Hände am Handy.
  EN TP: hands on the steering wheel
  de TP: Hände am Lenkrad
  EN FP: a boat's steering wheel
  de FP: das Steuerrad eines Boots
1358 | stepmother (noun): the woman married to your father, not your mum | loc: Stiefmutter
  EN TS: Her stepmother is braiding her hair.
  de TS: Ihre Stiefmutter flicht ihr die Haare.
  EN FS: Her stepmother is cutting her hair.
  de FS: Ihre Stiefmutter schneidet ihr die Haare.
  EN TP: a stepmother braiding hair
  de TP: eine Stiefmutter flicht Haare
  EN FP: a stepmother at school
  de FP: eine Stiefmutter in der Schule
1359 | stepsister (noun): the daughter of your parent's new partner | loc: Stiefschwester
  EN TS: The stepsisters can't stop laughing.
  de TS: Die Stiefschwestern können nicht aufhören zu lachen.
  EN FS: The stepsisters can't stop crying.
  de FS: Die Stiefschwestern können nicht aufhören zu weinen.
  EN TP: stepsisters laughing together
  de TP: Stiefschwestern lachen zusammen
  EN FP: stepsisters sharing a bed
  de FP: Stiefschwestern teilen sich ein Bett
1360 | stethoscope (noun): the tool a doctor uses to listen to your heart | loc: Stethoskop
  EN TS: She is using a stethoscope. Shh!
  de TS: Sie benutzt ein Stethoskop. Psst!
  EN FS: She is using a thermometer. Shh!
  de FS: Sie benutzt ein Thermometer. Psst!
  EN TP: listening with a stethoscope
  de TP: mit dem Stethoskop abhören
  EN FP: a stethoscope on a table
  de FP: ein Stethoskop auf dem Tisch
1362 | stitch (noun): a small loop of thread that closes a wound | loc: Stich
  EN TS: The cut is getting stitches.
  de TS: Der Schnitt bekommt ein paar Stiche.
  EN FS: The cut is getting a plaster.
  de FS: Der Schnitt bekommt ein Pflaster.
  EN TP: stitches in a forearm
  de TP: Stiche im Unterarm
  EN FP: stitches in a shirt
  de FP: Stiche in einem Hemd
1363 | stone (noun): a lump or mass of hard rock | loc: Stein
  EN TS: This stone will swim, right?
  de TS: Dieser Stein schwimmt, oder?
  EN FS: This leaf will swim, right?
  de FS: Dieses Blatt schwimmt, oder?
  EN TP: a stone over a lake
  de TP: ein Stein über einem See
  EN FP: a stone in a wall
  de FP: ein Stein in einer Mauer
1365 | stranger (noun): a person you do not know at all | loc: Fremder
  EN TS: A stranger is stopping her.
  de TS: Ein Fremder hält sie an.
  EN FS: A policeman is stopping her.
  de FS: Ein Polizist hält sie an.
  EN TP: a stranger in a hood
  de TP: ein Fremder mit Kapuze
  EN FP: a stranger with a dog
  de FP: ein Fremder mit Hund
1366 | stream (noun): a small narrow river running through land | loc: Bach
  EN TS: A leaf is surfing the stream.
  de TS: Ein Blatt surft den Bach runter.
  EN FS: A frog is surfing the stream.
  de FS: Ein Frosch surft den Bach runter.
  EN TP: a clear forest stream
  de TP: ein klarer Waldbach
  EN FP: a stream full of fish
  de FP: ein Bach voller Fische
1367 | street (noun): a road in a town lined with buildings | loc: Straße
  EN TS: She is crossing a busy street.
  de TS: Sie überquert eine belebte Straße.
  EN FS: She is crossing a busy bridge.
  de FS: Sie überquert eine belebte Brücke.
  EN TP: a busy big-city street
  de TP: eine belebte Großstadtstraße
  EN FP: a quiet village street
  de FP: eine ruhige Dorfstraße
1369 | streetlight (noun): a tall lamp that lights a street at night | loc: Straßenlaterne
  EN TS: Rain? He is dancing with a streetlight!
  de TS: Regen? Er tanzt mit einer Straßenlaterne!
  EN FS: Rain? He is dancing with a traffic light!
  de FS: Regen? Er tanzt mit einer Ampel!
  EN TP: a row of lit streetlights
  de TP: eine Reihe leuchtender Straßenlaternen
  EN FP: a row of lit candles
  de FP: eine Reihe brennender Kerzen
1371 | subway (noun): an underground train in a city | loc: U-Bahn
  EN TS: The subway train is super fast.
  de TS: Die U-Bahn ist mega schnell.
  EN FS: The subway train is super slow.
  de FS: Die U-Bahn ist mega langsam.
  EN TP: a subway train rushing past
  de TP: eine U-Bahn rauscht vorbei
  EN FP: a subway map
  de FP: ein U-Bahn-Plan
1372 | suitcase (noun): a large case with a handle for carrying clothes | loc: Koffer
  EN TS: Her suitcase is grey and practical.
  de TS: Ihr Koffer ist grau und praktisch.
  EN FS: Her suitcase is red and practical.
  de FS: Ihr Koffer ist rot und praktisch.
  EN TP: pulling a grey suitcase
  de TP: einen grauen Koffer ziehen
  EN FP: packing a grey suitcase
  de FP: einen grauen Koffer packen
1373 | summer (noun): the warmest season of the year | loc: Sommer
  EN TS: Summer vibes: big lake jump.
  de TS: Sommer-Vibes: großer Sprung in den See.
  EN FS: Summer vibes: big pool jump.
  de FS: Sommer-Vibes: großer Sprung in den Pool.
  EN TP: a summer lake jump
  de TP: ein Sommersprung in den See
  EN FP: a summer pool party
  de FP: eine Sommer-Poolparty
1375 | sweat (noun): the salty fluid your skin lets out when hot | loc: Schweiß
  EN TS: Sweat is flying off her glove!
  de TS: Schweiß fliegt von ihrem Handschuh!
  EN FS: Sweat is flying off her shoe!
  de FS: Schweiß fliegt von ihrem Schuh!
  EN TP: sweat on her arm
  de TP: Schweiß auf ihrem Arm
  EN FP: sweat on a shirt
  de FP: Schweiß auf einem Shirt
1378 | swiss (adjective): from or made in Switzerland | loc: Schweizer
  EN TS: She is having a Swiss fondue.
  de TS: Sie isst ein Schweizer Fondue.
  EN FS: She is having Swiss chocolate.
  de FS: Sie isst Schweizer Schokolade.
  EN TP: a Swiss cheese fondue
  de TP: ein Schweizer Käsefondue
  EN FP: a Swiss chocolate fondue
  de FP: ein Schweizer Schokoladenfondue
1379 | switch (noun): a device that turns the electricity on or off | loc: Lichtschalter
  EN TS: Someone found the switch. Wow.
  de TS: Jemand hat den Lichtschalter gefunden. Wow.
  EN FS: Someone found the phone. Wow.
  de FS: Jemand hat das Handy gefunden. Wow.
  EN TP: a light switch
  de TP: ein Lichtschalter
  EN FP: a railway switch
  de FP: eine Eisenbahnweiche
1380 | switzerland (noun): a small country in Europe known for the Alps | loc: Schweiz
  EN TS: Switzerland: even the cows get music.
  de TS: Schweiz: Sogar die Kühe kriegen Musik.
  EN FS: Switzerland: even the goats get music.
  de FS: Schweiz: Sogar die Ziegen kriegen Musik.
  EN TP: an alphorn in Switzerland
  de TP: ein Alphorn in der Schweiz
  EN FP: a cowbell shop in Switzerland
  de FP: ein Kuhglockenladen in der Schweiz
1381 | syringe (noun): a tube with a needle used to inject medicine | loc: Spritze
  EN TS: The syringe is squirting!
  de TS: Die Spritze spritzt!
  EN FS: The bottle is squirting!
  de FS: Die Flasche spritzt!
  EN TP: squirting a syringe
  de TP: Flüssigkeit aus einer Spritze
  EN FP: filling a syringe
  de FP: eine Spritze aufziehen
1383 | tailor (noun): a person who makes and fits clothes | loc: Schneider
  EN TS: The tailor is fixing a jacket.
  de TS: Der Schneider flickt eine Jacke.
  EN FS: The tailor is fixing a shoe.
  de FS: Der Schneider flickt einen Schuh.
  EN TP: a tailor with a tape
  de TP: ein Schneider mit Maßband
  EN FP: a tailor selling shoes
  de FP: ein Schneider verkauft Schuhe
1385 | tap (noun): a thing you turn to let water run out | loc: Wasserhahn | translator note: tap-on-the-shoulder pun replaced
  EN TS: Water from a tap! Wow!
  de TS: Wasser aus dem Wasserhahn! Wow!
  EN FS: Water from a hose! Wow!
  de FS: Wasser aus dem Schlauch! Wow!
  EN TP: turning the tap
  de TP: den Wasserhahn aufdrehen
  EN FP: a tap on the shoulder
  de FP: einen Zapfhahn aufdrehen
1386 | taxi driver (noun): a person paid to take people places by car | loc: Taxifahrer
  EN TS: The taxi driver is waving!
  de TS: Der Taxifahrer winkt!
  EN FS: The taxi driver is sleeping!
  de FS: Der Taxifahrer pennt!
  EN TP: a waving taxi driver
  de TP: ein winkender Taxifahrer
  EN FP: a taxi driver at night
  de FP: ein Taxifahrer bei Nacht
1389 | tear (noun): a drop of water that falls from your eye | loc: Träne
  EN TS: Her tears are falling.
  de TS: Ihre Tränen fließen.
  EN FS: His tears are falling.
  de FS: Seine Tränen fließen.
  EN TP: a tear on her cheek
  de TP: eine Träne auf ihrer Wange
  EN FP: a tear in her dress
  de FP: ein Riss in ihrem Kleid
1390 | moon (noun): the big round light in the sky at night | loc: Mond
  EN TS: He wants to touch the moon.
  de TS: Er will den Mond berühren.
  EN FS: He wants to touch the sun.
  de FS: Er will die Sonne berühren.
  EN TP: reaching for the moon
  de TP: nach dem Mond greifen
  EN FP: a moon over the sea
  de FP: ein Mond über dem Meer
1394 | sun (noun): the light and rays of the sun | loc: Sonne
  EN TS: A big orange sun on the sea.
  de TS: Eine große orange Sonne über dem Meer.
  EN FS: A big orange sun on the snow.
  de FS: Eine große orange Sonne über dem Schnee.
  EN TP: the sun over the sea
  de TP: die Sonne über dem Meer
  EN FP: the sun over mountains
  de FP: die Sonne über den Bergen
1396 | theater (noun): a building where people watch plays | loc: Theater
  EN TS: The whole theater is hers!
  de TS: Das ganze Theater gehört ihr!
  EN FS: The whole theater is his!
  de FS: Das ganze Theater gehört ihm!
  EN TP: an empty old theater
  de TP: ein leeres altes Theater
  EN FP: a theater full of people
  de FP: ein Theater voller Menschen
1398 | thermometer (noun): an instrument that measures temperature | loc: Thermometer
  EN TS: Her thermometer is huge!
  de TS: Ihr Thermometer ist riesig!
  EN FS: Her toothbrush is huge!
  de FS: Ihre Zahnbürste ist riesig!
  EN TP: a big glass thermometer
  de TP: ein großes Glasthermometer
  EN FP: a thermometer on the wall
  de FP: ein Thermometer an der Wand
1400 | throat (noun): the passage to your stomach and lungs | loc: Hals
  EN TS: Her throat is getting a check.
  de TS: Ihr Hals wird untersucht.
  EN FS: Her ear is getting a check.
  de FS: Ihr Ohr wird untersucht.
  EN TP: a light in the throat
  de TP: ein Licht im Hals
  EN FP: clearing her throat
  de FP: sich räuspern
1403 | toe (noun): one of the five small end parts of the foot | loc: Zeh
  EN TS: These toes love the beach!
  de TS: Diese Zehen lieben den Strand!
  EN FS: These toes love the snow!
  de FS: Diese Zehen lieben den Schnee!
  EN TP: toes in wet sand
  de TP: Zehen im nassen Sand
  EN FP: toes in soft grass
  de FP: Zehen im weichen Gras
1404 | tongue (noun): the soft muscular part inside your mouth | loc: Zunge
  EN TS: Her tongue is catching snow for lunch.
  de TS: Ihre Zunge fängt Schnee zum Mittagessen.
  EN FS: Her hand is catching snow for lunch.
  de FS: Ihre Hand fängt Schnee zum Mittagessen.
  EN TP: sticking out her tongue
  de TP: die Zunge rausstrecken
  EN FP: biting her tongue
  de FP: sich auf die Zunge beißen
1405 | tooth (noun): one of the hard white parts in your jaws | loc: Zahn
  EN TS: Every single tooth is being checked.
  de TS: Jeder einzelne Zahn wird kontrolliert.
  EN FS: Every single nail is being checked.
  de FS: Jeder einzelne Nagel wird kontrolliert.
  EN TP: checking a tooth
  de TP: einen Zahn untersuchen
  EN FP: a tooth fairy
  de FP: eine Zahnfee
1406 | toothbrush (noun): a small brush used for cleaning the teeth | loc: Zahnbürste
  EN TS: Look at my toothbrush!
  de TS: Schau dir meine Zahnbürste an!
  EN FS: Look at my hairbrush!
  de FS: Schau dir meine Haarbürste an!
  EN TP: a toothbrush with foam
  de TP: eine Zahnbürste mit Schaum
  EN FP: a toothbrush in a cup
  de FP: eine Zahnbürste im Becher
1410 | traffic light (noun): the lights that tell cars to stop and go | loc: Ampel
  EN TS: She is at a traffic light.
  de TS: Sie steht an einer Ampel.
  EN FS: She is at a bus stop.
  de FS: Sie steht an einer Bushaltestelle.
  EN TP: waiting at a traffic light
  de TP: an der Ampel warten
  EN FP: waiting at a train station
  de FP: am Bahnhof warten
1411 | tram (noun): an electric city train on rails in the street | loc: Straßenbahn
  EN TS: Old tram, big smile, great style.
  de TS: Alte Straßenbahn, breites Lächeln, super Style.
  EN FS: Old bus, big smile, great style.
  de FS: Alter Bus, breites Lächeln, super Style.
  EN TP: an old green tram
  de TP: eine alte grüne Straßenbahn
  EN FP: an old green bus
  de FP: ein alter grüner Bus
1413 | treadmill (noun): a gym machine with a moving belt to run on | loc: Laufband
  EN TS: Treadmill: running to nowhere.
  de TS: Laufband: rennen ins Nirgendwo.
  EN FS: Treadmill: walking to nowhere.
  de FS: Laufband: spazieren ins Nirgendwo.
  EN TP: running on a treadmill
  de TP: auf dem Laufband rennen
  EN FP: fixing a broken treadmill
  de FP: ein kaputtes Laufband reparieren
1414 | enormous (adjective): extremely big | loc: riesig
  EN TS: Wow, the oak is enormous!
  de TS: Wow, die Eiche ist riesig!
  EN FS: Wow, the palm is enormous!
  de FS: Wow, die Palme ist riesig!
  EN TP: an enormous oak tree
  de TP: eine riesige Eiche
  EN FP: an enormous picnic basket
  de FP: ein riesiger Picknickkorb
1415 | truck (noun): a big road vehicle for hauling things | loc: Lastwagen
  EN TS: He is climbing into his truck.
  de TS: Er steigt in seinen Lastwagen.
  EN FS: He is climbing into his car.
  de FS: Er steigt in sein Auto.
  EN TP: a big silver truck
  de TP: ein großer silberner Lastwagen
  EN FP: a big silver bus
  de FP: ein großer silberner Bus
1416 | tunnel (noun): a passage cut under the ground for traffic | loc: der Tunnel
  EN TS: He is riding out of a tunnel.
  de TS: Er fährt aus einem Tunnel.
  EN FS: He is riding out of a garage.
  de FS: Er fährt aus einer Garage.
  EN TP: out of a road tunnel
  de TP: aus einem Straßentunnel heraus
  EN FP: into a train tunnel
  de FP: in einen Zugtunnel hinein
1419 | twin (noun): one of two children born at the same time | loc: Zwilling
  EN TS: Twins, same dress. Planned?
  de TS: Zwillinge, gleiches Kleid. Geplant?
  EN FS: Twins, same hat. Planned?
  de FS: Zwillinge, gleicher Hut. Geplant?
  EN TP: twins in matching dresses
  de TP: Zwillinge in gleichen Kleidern
  EN FP: twins in a pram
  de FP: Zwillinge im Kinderwagen
1420 | uncle (noun): the brother of your father or mother | loc: Onkel
  EN TS: Best uncle ever!
  de TS: Bester Onkel ever!
  EN FS: Best aunt ever!
  de FS: Beste Tante ever!
  EN TP: on his uncle's shoulders
  de TP: auf den Schultern seines Onkels
  EN FP: on his uncle's bike
  de FP: auf dem Fahrrad seines Onkels
1422 | to point (verb): to show where something is with your finger | loc: zeigen
  EN TS: A hand is pointing at the screen.
  de TS: Eine Hand zeigt auf den Bildschirm.
  EN FS: A hand is pointing at the window.
  de FS: Eine Hand zeigt auf das Fenster.
  EN TP: to point at a screen
  de TP: auf einen Bildschirm zeigen
  EN FP: to point at the door
  de FP: auf die Tür zeigen
1423 | chart (noun): a drawing that shows data as bars or lines | loc: Diagramm
  EN TS: Pointing at a bar chart.
  de TS: Jemand zeigt auf ein Balkendiagramm.
  EN FS: Pointing at a pie chart.
  de FS: Jemand zeigt auf ein Tortendiagramm.
  EN TP: bar and line charts
  de TP: Balken- und Liniendiagramme
  EN FP: a chart on paper
  de FP: ein Diagramm auf Papier
1424 | colleague (noun): a person you work with at your job | loc: Kollege
  EN TS: The standing colleague wears blue.
  de TS: Der stehende Kollege trägt Blau.
  EN FS: The standing colleague wears red.
  de FS: Der stehende Kollege trägt Rot.
  EN TP: colleague in a blue shirt
  de TP: Kollege im blauen Hemd
  EN FP: colleague in a red shirt
  de FP: Kollege im roten Hemd
1425 | leash (noun): a strap you hold to control a dog | loc: Leine
  EN TS: Guess who is on a leash.
  de TS: Rate mal, wer an der Leine ist.
  EN FS: Guess who is on a sofa.
  de FS: Rate mal, wer auf dem Sofa ist.
  EN TP: a dog on a leash
  de TP: ein Hund an der Leine
  EN FP: a dog off the leash
  de FP: ein Hund ohne Leine
1427 | to balance (verb): to keep your body steady so you don't fall | loc: balancieren
  EN TS: He is balancing on a rope!
  de TS: Er balanciert auf einem Seil!
  EN FS: He is balancing on a log!
  de FS: Er balanciert auf einem Baumstamm!
  EN TP: balancing on a thin rope
  de TP: auf einem dünnen Seil balancieren
  EN FP: balancing on a thin branch
  de FP: auf einem dünnen Ast balancieren
1429 | to sing (verb): to make music with your voice | loc: singen
  EN TS: He is singing for his friends.
  de TS: Er singt für seine Freunde.
  EN FS: He is dancing for his friends.
  de FS: Er tanzt für seine Freunde.
  EN TP: singing into a microphone
  de TP: ins Mikrofon singen
  EN FP: singing in the shower
  de FP: unter der Dusche singen
1432 | costume (noun): special clothes worn for a show or festival | loc: Kostüm
  EN TS: He is singing in a costume. The glass slipper is ready.
  de TS: Er singt in einem Kostüm. Der gläserne Schuh liegt bereit.
  EN FS: He is dancing in a costume. The glass slipper is ready.
  de FS: Er tanzt in einem Kostüm. Der gläserne Schuh liegt bereit.
  EN TP: singing in a costume
  de TP: im Kostüm singen
  EN FP: shopping for a costume
  de FP: ein Kostüm kaufen
1433 | to dance (verb): to move your body to music | loc: tanzen
  EN TS: It's just a normal dance at home.
  de TS: Ganz normaler Abend: Zu Hause wird getanzt.
  EN FS: It's just a normal dinner at home.
  de FS: Ganz normaler Abend: Zu Hause wird gegessen.
  EN TP: dancing in costumes
  de TP: in Kostümen tanzen
  EN FP: dancing on a stage
  de FP: auf einer Bühne tanzen
1434 | thief (noun): a person who steals things | loc: Dieb
  EN TS: Nobody sees the thief on the chandelier.
  de TS: Niemand sieht den Dieb am Kronleuchter.
  EN FS: Nobody sees the thief on the roof.
  de FS: Niemand sieht den Dieb auf dem Dach.
  EN TP: a thief with a bag
  de TP: ein Dieb mit Tasche
  EN FP: a thief with a gun
  de FP: ein Dieb mit Pistole
1435 | microphone (noun): a device you speak into to make your voice louder | loc: Mikrofon
  EN TS: He won't share the microphone.
  de TS: Er gibt das Mikrofon nicht mehr her.
  EN FS: He won't share the guitar.
  de FS: Er gibt die Gitarre nicht mehr her.
  EN TP: a microphone on a stand
  de TP: ein Mikrofon auf einem Ständer
  EN FP: a microphone in a phone
  de FP: ein Mikrofon im Handy
1436 | diverse (adjective): of many different kinds | loc: vielfältig
  EN TS: The people are diverse in age.
  de TS: Die Menschen sind altersmäßig vielfältig.
  EN FS: The people are all teenagers.
  de FS: Die Menschen sind alle Teenager.
  EN TP: five diverse portraits
  de TP: fünf vielfältige Porträts
  EN FP: five diverse landscapes
  de FP: fünf vielfältige Landschaften
1438 | podcast (noun): a talk show you record and stream online | loc: Podcast
  EN TS: He is recording a podcast.
  de TS: Er nimmt einen Podcast auf.
  EN FS: She is recording a podcast.
  de FS: Sie nimmt einen Podcast auf.
  EN TP: recording a podcast
  de TP: einen Podcast aufnehmen
  EN FP: listening to a podcast
  de FP: einen Podcast hören
1441 | effort (noun): the hard work you put into something | loc: Mühe
  EN TS: Her win was worth the effort.
  de TS: Ihr Sieg war die Mühe wert.
  EN FS: Her win was worth the money.
  de FS: Ihr Sieg war das Geld wert.
  EN TP: worth the effort
  de TP: die Mühe wert
  EN FP: an effort to stay awake
  de FP: Mühe, wach zu bleiben
1442 | office (noun): a place of business where people do office work | loc: Büro
  EN TS: This office is full of plants.
  de TS: Dieses Büro ist voller Pflanzen.
  EN FS: This office is full of dogs.
  de FS: Dieses Büro ist voller Hunde.
  EN TP: a bright open office
  de TP: ein helles Großraumbüro
  EN FP: a dark empty office
  de FP: ein dunkles leeres Büro
1446 | conference (noun): a big event where people meet to hear talks | loc: Konferenz
  EN TS: The conference is packed!
  de TS: Die Konferenz ist rappelvoll!
  EN FS: The conference is empty!
  de FS: Die Konferenz ist leer!
  EN TP: a crowded conference hall
  de TP: ein voller Konferenzsaal
  EN FP: a video conference call
  de FP: eine Videokonferenz
1447 | vaccine (noun): an injection that protects you from a disease | loc: der Impfstoff
  EN TS: The vaccine hurts a bit.
  de TS: Der Impfstoff piekst ein bisschen.
  EN FS: The vaccine tickles a bit.
  de FS: Der Impfstoff kitzelt ein bisschen.
  EN TP: a vaccine in the arm
  de TP: Impfstoff in den Arm
  EN FP: a vaccine in the leg
  de FP: Impfstoff ins Bein
1450 | visitor (noun): someone who comes to visit you | loc: Besucher
  EN TS: Flowers from a visitor. Sweet.
  de TS: Blumen von einem Besucher. Süß.
  EN FS: Candy from a visitor. Sweet.
  de FS: Süßigkeiten von einem Besucher. Süß.
  EN TP: a visitor with flowers
  de TP: ein Besucher mit Blumen
  EN FP: a visitor at the museum
  de FP: ein Besucher im Museum
1451 | vitamin (noun): a substance in food that keeps you healthy | loc: das Vitamin
  EN TS: This vitamin makes her laugh.
  de TS: Dieses Vitamin bringt sie zum Lachen.
  EN FS: This vitamin makes her cry.
  de FS: Dieses Vitamin bringt sie zum Weinen.
  EN TP: an orange gummy vitamin
  de TP: ein orangefarbenes Gummi-Vitamin
  EN FP: a green gummy vitamin
  de FP: ein grünes Gummi-Vitamin
1452 | volcano (noun): a mountain that erupts fire and melted rock | loc: der Vulkan
  EN TS: The volcano is a bit angry.
  de TS: Der Vulkan ist ein bisschen sauer.
  EN FS: The volcano is a bit sleepy.
  de FS: Der Vulkan ist ein bisschen müde.
  EN TP: a volcano erupting at night
  de TP: ein Vulkan bricht nachts aus
  EN FP: a volcano covered in snow
  de FP: ein schneebedeckter Vulkan
1453 | voyage (noun): a long journey across the sea by ship | loc: die Seereise
  EN TS: The ship is on a long voyage.
  de TS: Das Schiff ist auf einer langen Seereise.
  EN FS: The ship is on a river voyage.
  de FS: Das Schiff ist auf einer Flussreise.
  EN TP: a voyage across the ocean
  de TP: eine Seereise über den Ozean
  EN FP: a voyage along the river
  de FP: eine Reise den Fluss entlang
1454 | waist (noun): the narrow middle of the body above the hips | loc: Taille
  EN TS: She is measuring her waist.
  de TS: Sie misst ihre Taille.
  EN FS: She is measuring her arm.
  de FS: Sie misst ihren Arm.
  EN TP: a tape around the waist
  de TP: ein Maßband um die Taille
  EN FP: a belt around the waist
  de FP: ein Gürtel um die Taille
1457 | waitress (noun): a woman who serves food to guests in a restaurant | loc: Kellnerin
  EN TS: The waitress is serving a milkshake.
  de TS: Die Kellnerin serviert einen Milchshake.
  EN FS: The waitress is serving a pizza.
  de FS: Die Kellnerin serviert eine Pizza.
  EN TP: a waitress serving breakfast
  de TP: eine Kellnerin serviert Frühstück
  EN FP: a waitress eating breakfast
  de FP: eine Kellnerin frühstückt
1458 | walker (noun): someone who walks for exercise or pleasure | loc: der Spaziergänger
  EN TS: The walker has a golden dog.
  de TS: Der Spaziergänger hat einen goldfarbenen Hund.
  EN FS: The walker has a black dog.
  de FS: Der Spaziergänger hat einen schwarzen Hund.
  EN TP: a walker with trekking poles
  de TP: ein Spaziergänger mit Wanderstöcken
  EN FP: a walker with a buggy
  de FP: ein Spaziergänger mit Kinderwagen
1459 | wall (noun): a flat side of a room, taller than its thickness | loc: Wand
  EN TS: He is painting the wall white.
  de TS: Er streicht die Wand weiß.
  EN FS: He is painting the wall blue.
  de FS: Er streicht die Wand blau.
  EN TP: a big bare wall
  de TP: eine große kahle Wand
  EN FP: a wall around a garden
  de FP: eine Mauer um einen Garten
1466 | weather (noun): the state of the sky: sun, rain, wind, clouds | loc: Wetter
  EN TS: Rain or sun? The weather can't decide.
  de TS: Regen oder Sonne? Das Wetter kann sich nicht entscheiden.
  EN FS: Snow or sun? The weather can't decide.
  de FS: Schnee oder Sonne? Das Wetter kann sich nicht entscheiden.
  EN TP: changing weather on a hill
  de TP: wechselhaftes Wetter auf einem Hügel
  EN FP: sunny weather on a beach
  de FP: sonniges Wetter am Strand
1467 | wheel (noun): a round frame that turns on an axle | loc: Rad
  EN TS: A mechanic is rolling a wheel.
  de TS: Ein Mechaniker rollt ein Rad.
  EN FS: A mechanic is washing a wheel.
  de FS: Ein Mechaniker wäscht ein Rad.
  EN TP: rolling a car wheel
  de TP: ein Autorad rollen
  EN FP: a wheel on a bicycle
  de FP: ein Rad an einem Fahrrad
1468 | wheelchair (noun): a chair on wheels for someone who cannot walk | loc: der Rollstuhl
  EN TS: Full speed in a racing wheelchair!
  de TS: Vollgas im Rennrollstuhl!
  EN FS: Full speed in a racing go-kart!
  de FS: Vollgas im Renn-Gokart!
  EN TP: a racing wheelchair
  de TP: ein Rennrollstuhl
  EN FP: a wheelchair ramp
  de FP: eine Rollstuhlrampe
1473 | worker (noun): a person who works at a job | loc: Arbeiter
  EN TS: The worker is holding a beam.
  de TS: Der Arbeiter hält einen Balken.
  EN FS: The worker is holding a pipe.
  de FS: Der Arbeiter hält ein Rohr.
  EN TP: a worker in goggles
  de TP: ein Arbeiter mit Schutzbrille
  EN FP: a worker in a suit
  de FP: ein Arbeiter im Anzug
1476 | writer (noun): a person who creates books or stories as a job | loc: Schriftsteller
  EN TS: The writer is typing at night, of course.
  de TS: Der Schriftsteller tippt nachts, natürlich.
  EN FS: The writer is typing at noon, of course.
  de FS: Der Schriftsteller tippt mittags, natürlich.
  EN TP: a writer at a typewriter
  de TP: ein Schriftsteller an der Schreibmaschine
  EN FP: a writer at a laptop
  de FP: ein Schriftsteller am Laptop
1477 | x ray (noun): a photo of the inside of the body showing bones | loc: das Röntgenbild
  EN TS: The X-ray shows hand bones.
  de TS: Das Röntgenbild zeigt Handknochen.
  EN FS: The X-ray shows foot bones.
  de FS: Das Röntgenbild zeigt Fußknochen.
  EN TP: an X-ray of a hand
  de TP: ein Röntgenbild einer Hand
  EN FP: an X-ray of a foot
  de FP: ein Röntgenbild eines Fußes
1479 | zoo (noun): a place where wild animals are kept to see | loc: Zoo
  EN TS: Lunch service at the zoo.
  de TS: Mittagsservice im Zoo.
  EN FS: Lunch service at the farm.
  de FS: Mittagsservice auf dem Bauernhof.
  EN TP: a giraffe at the zoo
  de TP: eine Giraffe im Zoo
  EN FP: a lion at the zoo
  de FP: ein Löwe im Zoo
1481 | archway (noun): a curved opening in a wall that you walk through | loc: Torbogen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The castle has two archways.
  de TS: Die Burg hat zwei Torbögen.
  EN FS: The castle has four archways.
  de FS: Die Burg hat vier Torbögen.
  EN TP: an archway under the steps
  de TP: ein Torbogen unter der Treppe
  EN FP: an archway over the river
  de FP: ein Torbogen über dem Fluss
1482 | earrings (noun): pieces of jewellery you wear on your ears | loc: Ohrringe
  EN TS: Great gold earrings!
  de TS: Tolle goldene Ohrringe!
  EN FS: Great silver earrings!
  de FS: Tolle silberne Ohrringe!
  EN TP: big gold hoop earrings
  de TP: große goldene Ohrringe
  EN FP: earrings in a gift box
  de FP: Ohrringe in einer Geschenkbox
1483 | strawberry (noun): a soft red fruit with tiny seeds on it | loc: Erdbeere
  EN TS: The strawberries are red.
  de TS: Die Erdbeeren sind rot.
  EN FS: The strawberries are green.
  de FS: Die Erdbeeren sind grün.
  EN TP: a strawberry plant
  de TP: eine Erdbeerpflanze
  EN FP: a strawberry milkshake
  de FP: ein Erdbeer-Milchshake
1484 | music (noun): an art form of instrumental or vocal tones | loc: Musik
  EN TS: This music has no play button.
  de TS: Diese Musik hat keinen Play-Button.
  EN FS: This poem has no play button.
  de FS: Dieses Gedicht hat keinen Play-Button.
  EN TP: old sheet music
  de TP: alte Musiknoten
  EN FP: an old music box
  de FP: eine alte Spieluhr
1485 | sell (verb): to give something in exchange for money | loc: verkaufen
  EN TS: They want to sell the house.
  de TS: Sie wollen das Haus verkaufen.
  EN FS: They want to sell the car.
  de FS: Sie wollen das Auto verkaufen.
  EN TP: selling a white house
  de TP: ein weißes Haus verkaufen
  EN FP: selling a red car
  de FP: ein rotes Auto verkaufen
1487 | god (noun): a divine being that people worship | loc: Gott
  EN TS: The god has a golden throne.
  de TS: Der Gott hat einen goldenen Thron.
  EN FS: The god has a silver throne.
  de FS: Der Gott hat einen silbernen Thron.
  EN TP: a god on a throne
  de TP: ein Gott auf einem Thron
  EN FP: a king on a horse
  de FP: ein König auf einem Pferd
1488 | carriage (noun): a wheeled vehicle pulled by horses | loc: Kutsche
  EN TS: Horses are pulling a carriage.
  de TS: Pferde ziehen eine Kutsche.
  EN FS: Oxen are pulling a carriage.
  de FS: Ochsen ziehen eine Kutsche.
  EN TP: a golden royal carriage
  de TP: eine goldene Königskutsche
  EN FP: a golden train carriage
  de FP: ein goldener Zugwaggon
1489 | fairy (noun): a small magic person with wings from stories | loc: Fee
  EN TS: The fairy's best friend is a frog.
  de TS: Der beste Kumpel der Fee: ein Frosch.
  EN FS: The fairy's best friend is a cat.
  de FS: Der beste Kumpel der Fee: eine Katze.
  EN TP: a fairy on the moss
  de TP: eine Fee auf dem Moos
  EN FP: a fairy in the sky
  de FP: eine Fee am Himmel
1491 | butterfly (noun): an insect with large colorful wings | loc: Schmetterling
  EN TS: So many butterflies!
  de TS: So viele Schmetterlinge!
  EN FS: So many birds!
  de FS: So viele Vögel!
  EN TP: butterflies above the flowers
  de TP: Schmetterlinge über den Blumen
  EN FP: butterflies on a shirt
  de FP: Schmetterlinge auf einem Shirt
1495 | unicorn (noun): an imaginary horse with one horn | loc: das Einhorn
  EN TS: Fact: a unicorn has one horn.
  de TS: Fakt: Ein Einhorn hat ein Horn.
  EN FS: Fact: a unicorn has two horns.
  de FS: Fakt: Ein Einhorn hat zwei Hörner.
  EN TP: a rearing unicorn
  de TP: ein sich aufbäumendes Einhorn
  EN FP: a sleeping unicorn
  de FP: ein schlafendes Einhorn
1497 | violin (noun): a small string instrument played with a bow | loc: die Geige
  EN TS: The violin sits on old music.
  de TS: Die Geige liegt auf alten Noten.
  EN FS: The guitar sits on old music.
  de FS: Die Gitarre liegt auf alten Noten.
  EN TP: a violin with roses
  de TP: eine Geige mit Rosen
  EN FP: a violin lesson
  de FP: eine Geigenstunde
1498 | balloon (noun): a big bag filled with hot air that carries people | loc: Heißluftballon
  EN TS: Two guys in a balloon. Ciao!
  de TS: Zwei Typen im Heißluftballon. Ciao!
  EN FS: Two guys on a horse. Ciao!
  de FS: Zwei Typen auf einem Pferd. Ciao!
  EN TP: a balloon with two men
  de TP: ein Heißluftballon mit zwei Männern
  EN FP: a balloon with two dogs
  de FP: ein Heißluftballon mit zwei Hunden
1499 | stem (noun): the long thin part that holds the flower | loc: Stängel
  EN TS: The stems are long and curly.
  de TS: Die Stängel sind lang und geschwungen.
  EN FS: The stems are short and thick.
  de FS: Die Stängel sind kurz und dick.
  EN TP: long curling stems
  de TP: lange, geschwungene Stängel
  EN FP: stems in a vase
  de FP: Stängel in einer Vase
1501 | pour (verb): to make a liquid flow out of a container | loc: gießen
  EN TS: She is pouring green liquid.
  de TS: Sie gießt grüne Flüssigkeit.
  EN FS: She is pouring red liquid.
  de FS: Sie gießt rote Flüssigkeit.
  EN TP: pouring from a wide bowl
  de TP: aus einer weiten Schale gießen
  EN FP: pouring tea into a cup
  de FP: Tee in eine Tasse gießen
1502 | sunset (noun): the evening moment when the sun goes down | loc: Sonnenuntergang
  EN TS: Sunset for two. So sweet.
  de TS: Sonnenuntergang zu zweit. So süß.
  EN FS: Breakfast for two. So sweet.
  de FS: Frühstück zu zweit. So süß.
  EN TP: watching the sunset together
  de TP: gemeinsam den Sonnenuntergang ansehen
  EN FP: a sunset in the mountains
  de FP: ein Sonnenuntergang in den Bergen
1504 | philosopher (noun): a person who studies big questions about life | loc: Philosoph
  EN TS: The philosopher has a beard.
  de TS: Der Philosoph hat einen Bart.
  EN FS: The philosopher has a hat.
  de FS: Der Philosoph hat einen Hut.
  EN TP: a bearded philosopher
  de TP: ein bärtiger Philosoph
  EN FP: a laughing philosopher
  de FP: ein lachender Philosoph
1505 | supermarket (noun): a big store selling food and household goods | loc: Supermarkt
  EN TS: Supermarket trip, 1950s style.
  de TS: Supermarkt-Trip im 50er-Jahre-Style.
  EN FS: Bakery trip, 1950s style.
  de FS: Bäckerei-Trip im 50er-Jahre-Style.
  EN TP: a supermarket checkout
  de TP: eine Supermarktkasse
  EN FP: a supermarket car park
  de FP: ein Supermarktparkplatz
1508 | church (noun): a place where Christians go to worship | loc: Kirche
  EN TS: The church has a tall tower.
  de TS: Die Kirche hat einen hohen Turm.
  EN FS: The church has a tiny tower.
  de FS: Die Kirche hat einen winzigen Turm.
  EN TP: an old stone church
  de TP: eine alte Steinkirche
  EN FP: an old stone bridge
  de FP: eine alte Steinbrücke
1510 | scream (verb): to cry out very loudly in fear | loc: schreien
  EN TS: Why is the figure screaming?
  de TS: Warum schreit die Figur?
  EN FS: Why is the figure singing?
  de FS: Warum singt die Figur?
  EN TP: screaming on a bridge
  de TP: auf einer Brücke schreien
  EN FP: screaming on a roller coaster
  de FP: in der Achterbahn schreien
1513 | pray (verb): to speak to a god | loc: beten
  EN TS: Hands pressed together to pray.
  de TS: Die Hände sind zum Beten aneinandergelegt.
  EN FS: Hands pressed together to clap.
  de FS: Die Hände sind zum Klatschen aneinandergelegt.
  EN TP: hands pressed to pray
  de TP: Hände zum Beten gefaltet
  EN FP: praying with open hands
  de FP: mit offenen Händen beten
1514 | religion (noun): belief in a god and its traditions | loc: Religion
  EN TS: Religion in an old painting.
  de TS: Religion in einem alten Gemälde.
  EN FS: Religion in a modern cartoon.
  de FS: Religion in einem modernen Comic.
  EN TP: a painting about religion
  de TP: ein Gemälde über Religion
  EN FP: a book about religion
  de FP: ein Buch über Religion
1519 | pretty (adjective): nice to look at, attractive in a gentle way | loc: hübsch
  EN TS: Her flowers are so pretty.
  de TS: Ihre Blumen sind so hübsch.
  EN FS: Her feathers are so pretty.
  de FS: Ihre Federn sind so hübsch.
  EN TP: pretty flowers in her hair
  de TP: hübsche Blumen im Haar
  EN FP: pretty ribbons in her hair
  de FP: hübsche Schleifen im Haar
1520 | curly (adjective): growing in curls instead of straight | loc: lockig
  EN TS: Curly hair and pearls? Classy.
  de TS: Lockiges Haar und Perlen? Stilvoll.
  EN FS: Short hair and pearls? Classy.
  de FS: Kurzes Haar und Perlen? Stilvoll.
  EN TP: long curly blond hair
  de TP: langes, lockiges blondes Haar
  EN FP: a curly-haired dog
  de FP: ein Hund mit lockigem Fell
1522 | basket (noun): a woven container with handles | loc: Korb
  EN TS: She has a basket of cherries.
  de TS: Sie hat einen Korb Kirschen.
  EN FS: She has a basket of apples.
  de FS: Sie hat einen Korb Äpfel.
  EN TP: a basket of cherries
  de TP: ein Korb voller Kirschen
  EN FP: a dog in a basket
  de FP: ein Hund im Korb
1523 | blonde (adjective): having pale yellow hair | loc: blond
  EN TS: Blonde hair full of flowers.
  de TS: Blondes Haar voller Blumen.
  EN FS: Black hair full of flowers.
  de FS: Schwarzes Haar voller Blumen.
  EN TP: long wavy blonde hair
  de TP: langes, welliges blondes Haar
  EN FP: short blonde hair
  de FP: kurzes blondes Haar
1524 | hitchhike (verb): to ask drivers for a free ride with your thumb | loc: trampen
  EN TS: He is hitchhiking, and a UFO answers.
  de TS: Er trampt – und ein UFO hält an.
  EN FS: He is hitchhiking, and a bus answers.
  de FS: Er trampt – und ein Bus hält an.
  EN TP: hitchhiking on a mountain road
  de TP: Trampen auf einer Bergstraße
  EN FP: hitchhiking on a motorway
  de FP: Trampen auf der Autobahn
1525 | train (noun): railway cars joined together that carry people | loc: Zug
  EN TS: The train is coming at us!
  de TS: Der Zug kommt direkt auf uns zu!
  EN FS: The truck is coming at us!
  de FS: Der Lkw kommt direkt auf uns zu!
  EN TP: a black steam train
  de TP: ein schwarzer Dampfzug
  EN FP: to train for a race
  de FP: für ein Rennen trainieren
1526 | warrior (noun): a person who fights in battles | loc: der Krieger
  EN TS: The warrior has a helmet.
  de TS: Der Krieger hat einen Helm.
  EN FS: The warrior has a shield.
  de FS: Der Krieger hat einen Schild.
  EN TP: a samurai warrior
  de TP: ein Samurai-Krieger
  EN FP: a warrior on horseback
  de FP: ein Krieger zu Pferd
1527 | cathedral (noun): a very large and important church | loc: Kathedrale
  EN TS: The cathedral has a huge dome.
  de TS: Die Kathedrale hat eine riesige Kuppel.
  EN FS: The cathedral has a flat roof.
  de FS: Die Kathedrale hat ein flaches Dach.
  EN TP: a baroque cathedral dome
  de TP: eine barocke Kathedralenkuppel
  EN FP: a cathedral choir singing
  de FP: ein Kathedralenchor singt
1528 | japan (noun): the East Asian country of Mount Fuji | loc: Japan
  EN TS: Balloons over Japan!
  de TS: Ballons über Japan!
  EN FS: Birds over Japan!
  de FS: Vögel über Japan!
  EN TP: symbols of Japan
  de TP: Symbole Japans
  EN FP: a map of Japan
  de FP: eine Karte von Japan
1529 | tower (noun): a tall narrow building or part of one | loc: Turm | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Two towers, one volcano.
  de TS: Zwei Türme, ein Vulkan.
  EN FS: Two towers, two volcanoes.
  de FS: Zwei Türme, zwei Vulkane.
  EN TP: two round castle towers
  de TP: zwei runde Burgtürme
  EN FP: two tall water towers
  de FP: zwei hohe Wassertürme
1530 | town (noun): a place with houses and shops, smaller than a city | loc: Kleinstadt
  EN TS: The town is on a hill. Nice view, they say.
  de TS: Die Kleinstadt liegt auf einem Hügel. Tolle Aussicht, sagt man.
  EN FS: The town is by the sea. Nice view, they say.
  de FS: Die Kleinstadt liegt am Meer. Tolle Aussicht, sagt man.
  EN TP: an old hilltop town
  de TP: eine alte Kleinstadt auf dem Hügel
  EN FP: a new seaside town
  de FP: eine neue Kleinstadt am Meer
1531 | arch (noun): a curved structure over an opening | loc: Bogen
  EN TS: An arch frames the church.
  de TS: Ein Bogen rahmt die Kirche ein.
  EN FS: A tree frames the church.
  de FS: Ein Baum rahmt die Kirche ein.
  EN TP: a large pointed arch
  de TP: ein großer Spitzbogen
  EN FP: a large pointed tower
  de FP: ein großer spitzer Turm
1534 | horn (noun): a hard pointed growth on an animal's head | loc: Horn
  EN TS: Wow, one horn on each horse!
  de TS: Wow, jedes Pferd hat ein Horn!
  EN FS: Wow, two horns on each horse!
  de FS: Wow, jedes Pferd hat zwei Hörner!
  EN TP: a unicorn's long horn
  de TP: das lange Horn eines Einhorns
  EN FP: a car's loud horn
  de FP: die laute Hupe eines Autos
1535 | upside down (adverb): with the top part at the bottom | loc: kopfüber
  EN TS: He is upside down. So easy.
  de TS: Er steht kopfüber. Voll easy.
  EN FS: He is lying down. So easy.
  de FS: Er liegt am Boden. Voll easy.
  EN TP: balancing upside down
  de TP: kopfüber balancieren
  EN FP: hanging upside down
  de FP: kopfüber hängen
1537 | egypt (noun): the country of the pyramids and the Nile | loc: Ägypten
  EN TS: Egypt's pharaoh has a bow.
  de TS: Ägyptens Pharao hat einen Bogen.
  EN FS: Egypt's pharaoh has a sword.
  de FS: Ägyptens Pharao hat ein Schwert.
  EN TP: a pharaoh of Egypt
  de TP: ein Pharao aus Ägypten
  EN FP: a pyramid in Egypt
  de FP: eine Pyramide in Ägypten
1538 | column (noun): a tall upright post that holds up a building | loc: Säule
  EN TS: She is between two columns.
  de TS: Sie steht zwischen zwei Säulen.
  EN FS: She is between two trees.
  de FS: Sie steht zwischen zwei Bäumen.
  EN TP: two decorated columns
  de TP: zwei verzierte Säulen
  EN FP: a column in a newspaper
  de FP: eine Zeitungskolumne
1541 | chapel (noun): a small church | loc: Kapelle
  EN TS: Tiny chapel, snowy vibes.
  de TS: Winzige Kapelle, Schnee-Vibes.
  EN FS: Tiny chapel, sunny vibes.
  de FS: Winzige Kapelle, Sonnen-Vibes.
  EN TP: a snowy white chapel
  de TP: eine verschneite weiße Kapelle
  EN FP: a chapel full of guests
  de FP: eine Kapelle voller Gäste
1543 | cabbage (noun): a big round vegetable with thick green leaves | loc: Kohl
  EN TS: She is holding a big cabbage.
  de TS: Sie hält einen großen Kohlkopf.
  EN FS: She is holding a big pumpkin.
  de FS: Sie hält einen großen Kürbis.
  EN TP: a garden full of cabbages
  de TP: ein Garten voller Kohl
  EN FP: a cabbage in a pot
  de FP: ein Kohl im Topf
1544 | laundry (noun): garments that can be cleaned by washing | loc: Wäsche
  EN TS: She is hanging up the laundry.
  de TS: Sie hängt die Wäsche auf.
  EN FS: She is hanging up the flags.
  de FS: Sie hängt die Fahnen auf.
  EN TP: hanging white laundry
  de TP: weiße Wäsche aufhängen
  EN FP: folding white laundry
  de FP: weiße Wäsche falten
1545 | queen (noun): a woman who rules a country, or a king's wife | loc: Königin
  EN TS: The queen's collar is huge!
  de TS: Der Kragen der Königin ist riesig!
  EN FS: The queen's dog is huge!
  de FS: Der Hund der Königin ist riesig!
  EN TP: a queen with a scepter
  de TP: eine Königin mit Zepter
  EN FP: a queen with a sword
  de FP: eine Königin mit Schwert
1547 | holy (adjective): connected with God and religion, sacred | loc: heilig
  EN TS: The holy man is thinking hard.
  de TS: Der heilige Mann denkt angestrengt nach.
  EN FS: The holy man is laughing hard.
  de FS: Der heilige Mann lacht sich schlapp.
  EN TP: a holy man thinking
  de TP: ein heiliger Mann denkt nach
  EN FP: a holy man praying
  de FP: ein heiliger Mann betet
1548 | window (noun): the glass opening in the side of a vehicle | loc: Fenster
  EN TS: People are in every window.
  de TS: In jedem Fenster sind Menschen.
  EN FS: Cats are in every window.
  de FS: In jedem Fenster sind Katzen.
  EN TP: a family in every window
  de TP: eine Familie in jedem Fenster
  EN FP: a cat in every window
  de FP: eine Katze in jedem Fenster
1549 | paint (noun): a coloured substance you put on a surface | loc: Farbe
  EN TS: Someone spilled all the paint!
  de TS: Jemand hat die ganze Farbe verschüttet!
  EN FS: Someone spilled all the milk!
  de FS: Jemand hat die ganze Milch verschüttet!
  EN TP: drips of paint
  de TP: Farbtropfen
  EN FP: a tin of paint
  de FP: eine Dose Farbe
1551 | guitar (noun): a stringed instrument with six strings | loc: Gitarre
  EN TS: Heaven sent us a guitar!
  de TS: Der Himmel hat uns eine Gitarre geschickt!
  EN FS: Heaven sent us a violin!
  de FS: Der Himmel hat uns eine Geige geschickt!
  EN TP: holding up a guitar
  de TP: eine Gitarre hochhalten
  EN FP: tuning a guitar
  de FP: eine Gitarre stimmen
1554 | monk (noun): a religious man who lives simply | loc: Mönch
  EN TS: The monk has a red umbrella.
  de TS: Der Mönch hat einen roten Regenschirm.
  EN FS: The monk has a black umbrella.
  de FS: Der Mönch hat einen schwarzen Regenschirm.
  EN TP: a monk in pink
  de TP: ein Mönch in Rosa
  EN FP: a monk in black
  de FP: ein Mönch in Schwarz
1555 | sword (noun): a long metal blade with a handle for fighting | loc: Schwert
  EN TS: The figure holds a big sword.
  de TS: Die Figur hält ein großes Schwert.
  EN FS: The figure holds a big spear.
  de FS: Die Figur hält einen großen Speer.
  EN TP: holding a sword upright
  de TP: ein Schwert aufrecht halten
  EN FP: a sword on the wall
  de FP: ein Schwert an der Wand
1559 | sunflower (noun): a very tall flower with a big round yellow head | loc: Sonnenblume
  EN TS: Sunflowers fill a yellow vase.
  de TS: Sonnenblumen füllen eine gelbe Vase.
  EN FS: Roses fill a yellow vase.
  de FS: Rosen füllen eine gelbe Vase.
  EN TP: sunflowers in a vase
  de TP: Sonnenblumen in einer Vase
  EN FP: sunflowers in a field
  de FP: Sonnenblumen auf einem Feld
1560 | swing (noun): a seat hanging on ropes that moves back and forth | loc: Schaukel
  EN TS: She is standing at a swing.
  de TS: Sie steht an einer Schaukel.
  EN FS: She is standing at a gate.
  de FS: Sie steht an einem Tor.
  EN TP: a rope swing
  de TP: eine Seilschaukel
  EN FP: a swing dance
  de FP: ein Swing-Tanz
1562 | cowboy (noun): a man who rides a horse and looks after cattle | loc: Cowboy
  EN TS: The cowboy is riding into the sunset.
  de TS: Der Cowboy reitet in den Sonnenuntergang.
  EN FS: The cowboy is riding into the sea.
  de FS: Der Cowboy reitet ins Meer.
  EN TP: a cowboy on a horse
  de TP: ein Cowboy auf einem Pferd
  EN FP: a cowboy on a bull
  de FP: ein Cowboy auf einem Bullen
1565 | gear (noun): a toothed wheel that turns inside a machine | loc: Zahnrad
  EN TS: She is made of rusty gears.
  de TS: Sie besteht aus rostigen Zahnrädern.
  EN FS: She is made of rusty chains.
  de FS: Sie besteht aus rostigen Ketten.
  EN TP: rusty metal gears
  de TP: rostige Zahnräder aus Metall
  EN FP: rusty metal chains
  de FP: rostige Metallketten
1567 | plane (noun): an aircraft with fixed wings and engines | loc: Flugzeug
  EN TS: The plane is climbing up!
  de TS: Das Flugzeug steigt auf!
  EN FS: The plane is going down!
  de FS: Das Flugzeug sinkt!
  EN TP: a plane climbing up
  de TP: ein Flugzeug im Steigflug
  EN FP: a plane coming down
  de FP: ein Flugzeug im Sinkflug
1568 | sail (verb): to travel on water in a boat pushed by the wind | loc: segeln
  EN TS: It is sailing under the moon.
  de TS: Es segelt im Mondschein.
  EN FS: It is sailing under the sun.
  de FS: Es segelt im Sonnenschein.
  EN TP: to sail at night
  de TP: nachts segeln
  EN FP: to sail in the sun
  de FP: in der Sonne segeln
1569 | portrait (noun): a picture that shows a person's face | loc: Porträt
  EN TS: It's a crosshatched portrait.
  de TS: Das ist ein Porträt in Kreuzschraffur.
  EN FS: It's a watercolour portrait.
  de FS: Das ist ein Porträt in Aquarell.
  EN TP: a pen-and-ink portrait
  de TP: ein Porträt in Feder und Tusche
  EN FP: a portrait in oil paint
  de FP: ein Porträt in Öl
1574 | lantern (noun): a lamp in a case that you hang or carry | loc: Laterne
  EN TS: A lantern hangs from a branch.
  de TS: Eine Laterne hängt an einem Ast.
  EN FS: A lantern hangs from a roof.
  de FS: Eine Laterne hängt an einem Dach.
  EN TP: a lantern on a chain
  de TP: eine Laterne an einer Kette
  EN FP: a lantern in her hand
  de FP: eine Laterne in ihrer Hand
1575 | couple (noun): two people in a romantic relationship | loc: Paar
  EN TS: The couple is hugging.
  de TS: Das Paar umarmt sich.
  EN FS: The couple is fighting.
  de FS: Das Paar streitet sich.
  EN TP: a couple under the moon
  de TP: ein Paar unter dem Mond
  EN FP: a couple on a beach
  de FP: ein Paar am Strand
1576 | dream (noun): the pictures you see while you are asleep | loc: Traum
  EN TS: In her dream, she swings from the moon.
  de TS: In ihrem Traum schaukelt sie am Mond.
  EN FS: In her dream, she swings from a tree.
  de FS: In ihrem Traum schaukelt sie an einem Baum.
  EN TP: a dream about the moon
  de TP: ein Traum vom Mond
  EN FP: a dream about the sea
  de FP: ein Traum vom Meer
1579 | smartphone (noun): a mobile phone that works like a small computer | loc: Smartphone
  EN TS: The smartphones built a house.
  de TS: Die Smartphones haben ein Haus gebaut.
  EN FS: The books built a house.
  de FS: Die Bücher haben ein Haus gebaut.
  EN TP: a house of smartphones
  de TP: ein Haus aus Smartphones
  EN FP: a smartphone in a pocket
  de FP: ein Smartphone in der Tasche
1581 | van (noun): a boxy road vehicle for carrying people or things | loc: Van
  EN TS: Van life, baby!
  de TS: Vanlife, Baby!
  EN FS: Tent life, baby!
  de FS: Zeltlife, Baby!
  EN TP: a van with a surfboard
  de TP: ein Van mit Surfbrett
  EN FP: a van with a bike
  de FP: ein Van mit Fahrrad
1583 | astronaut (noun): a person in a sealed suit who travels in space | loc: Astronaut
  EN TS: The astronaut is flying away!
  de TS: Der Astronaut fliegt davon!
  EN FS: The pilot is flying away!
  de FS: Der Pilot fliegt davon!
  EN TP: an astronaut in space
  de TP: ein Astronaut im All
  EN FP: an astronaut on the moon
  de FP: ein Astronaut auf dem Mond
1584 | dance (verb): to move your body to music | loc: tanzen
  EN TS: Her skirt is dancing too.
  de TS: Ihr Rock tanzt auch mit.
  EN FS: Her dog is dancing too.
  de FS: Ihr Hund tanzt auch mit.
  EN TP: dancing in a red skirt
  de TP: im roten Rock tanzen
  EN FP: to dance in the rain
  de FP: im Regen tanzen
1585 | white (adjective): having the color of snow or milk | loc: weiß
  EN TS: There are five white roses.
  de TS: Da sind fünf weiße Rosen.
  EN FS: There are five red roses.
  de FS: Da sind fünf rote Rosen.
  EN TP: five white rose blossoms
  de TP: fünf weiße Rosenblüten
  EN FP: white roses in a vase
  de FP: weiße Rosen in einer Vase
1586 | pollution (noun): dirt and smoke that make air and water unhealthy | loc: Verschmutzung
  EN TS: Pollution everywhere you look.
  de TS: Verschmutzung, wohin man schaut.
  EN FS: Flowers everywhere you look.
  de FS: Blumen, wohin man schaut.
  EN TP: pollution from a factory
  de TP: Verschmutzung durch eine Fabrik
  EN FP: pollution from a ship
  de FP: Verschmutzung durch ein Schiff
1589 | sad (adjective): feeling or showing unhappiness | loc: traurig
  EN TS: This person looks sad.
  de TS: Diese Person sieht traurig aus.
  EN FS: This person looks happy.
  de FS: Diese Person sieht glücklich aus.
  EN TP: a sad orange-haired figure
  de TP: eine traurige Figur mit orangem Haar
  EN FP: a sad blue-haired figure
  de FP: eine traurige Figur mit blauem Haar
1590 | hood (noun): the part of a coat that covers your head | loc: Kapuze
  EN TS: The hood is full of stars.
  de TS: Die Kapuze ist voller Sterne.
  EN FS: The hood is full of flowers.
  de FS: Die Kapuze ist voller Blumen.
  EN TP: a starry hood
  de TP: eine Kapuze voller Sterne
  EN FP: a hood over the eyes
  de FP: eine Kapuze über den Augen
1591 | lighthouse (noun): a tall sea tower whose light guides ships | loc: Leuchtturm
  EN TS: This lighthouse has stripes.
  de TS: Dieser Leuchtturm hat Streifen.
  EN FS: This lighthouse has spots.
  de FS: Dieser Leuchtturm hat Punkte.
  EN TP: a striped lighthouse
  de TP: ein gestreifter Leuchtturm
  EN FP: a striped beach hut
  de FP: eine gestreifte Strandhütte
1592 | robot (noun): a mechanism that can move automatically | loc: Roboter
  EN TS: The robot has blue lips. Cold?
  de TS: Der Roboter hat blaue Lippen. Friert er?
  EN FS: The robot has red lips. Cold?
  de FS: Der Roboter hat rote Lippen. Friert er?
  EN TP: a metal robot head
  de TP: ein Roboterkopf aus Metall
  EN FP: a robot vacuum
  de FP: ein Staubsaugerroboter
1593 | haircut (noun): the shape and style your hair is cut in | loc: Haarschnitt
  EN TS: Love that blue haircut!
  de TS: Ich liebe diesen blauen Haarschnitt!
  EN FS: Love that blue hat!
  de FS: Ich liebe diesen blauen Hut!
  EN TP: a teal bob haircut
  de TP: ein petrolfarbener Bob-Haarschnitt
  EN FP: a haircut in a salon
  de FP: ein Haarschnitt im Salon
1595 | pyramid (noun): a huge ancient building with triangle sides | loc: Pyramide
  EN TS: Two pyramids. Very pointy.
  de TS: Zwei Pyramiden. Sehr spitz.
  EN FS: Two towers. Very pointy.
  de FS: Zwei Türme. Sehr spitz.
  EN TP: two brown pyramids
  de TP: zwei braune Pyramiden
  EN FP: a pyramid of oranges
  de FP: eine Pyramide aus Orangen
1596 | russia (noun): the largest country in the world, east of Europe | loc: Russland
  EN TS: The moon shines over Russia.
  de TS: Der Mond scheint über Russland.
  EN FS: The sun shines over Russia.
  de FS: Die Sonne scheint über Russland.
  EN TP: a church in Russia
  de TP: eine Kirche in Russland
  EN FP: a palace in Russia
  de FP: ein Palast in Russland
1597 | underwater (adverb): below the surface of the water | loc: unter Wasser
  EN TS: Oops, his face is underwater!
  de TS: Ups, sein Gesicht ist unter Wasser!
  EN FS: Oops, his face is in the sand!
  de FS: Ups, sein Gesicht ist im Sand!
  EN TP: a dog underwater
  de TP: ein Hund unter Wasser
  EN FP: a dog above the water
  de FP: ein Hund über dem Wasser
1598 | jesus (noun): the central figure of the Christian faith | loc: Jesus
  EN TS: Jesus is raising one hand.
  de TS: Jesus hebt eine Hand.
  EN FS: Jesus is raising both hands.
  de FS: Jesus hebt beide Hände.
  EN TP: Jesus giving a blessing
  de TP: Jesus spendet den Segen
  EN FP: Jesus carrying a cross
  de FP: Jesus trägt das Kreuz
1600 | canal (noun): a man-made water street for boats | loc: Kanal
  EN TS: A small boat is on the canal.
  de TS: Ein kleines Boot ist auf dem Kanal.
  EN FS: A big ship is on the canal.
  de FS: Ein großes Schiff ist auf dem Kanal.
  EN TP: a boat on the canal
  de TP: ein Boot auf dem Kanal
  EN FP: a boat on the lake
  de FP: ein Boot auf dem See
1603 | oil (noun): the black fuel drilled from under the sea | loc: Erdöl
  EN TS: They drill for oil out at sea.
  de TS: Sie bohren draußen auf dem Meer nach Erdöl.
  EN FS: They drill for oil on a hill.
  de FS: Sie bohren auf einem Hügel nach Erdöl.
  EN TP: an oil platform at sea
  de TP: eine Erdölplattform auf See
  EN FP: oil in a frying pan
  de FP: Öl in einer Bratpfanne
1609 | ballet (noun): the classical dance with graceful poses | loc: Ballett
  EN TS: She is doing ballet on a rock!
  de TS: Sie tanzt Ballett auf einem Felsen!
  EN FS: She is doing ballet on a boat!
  de FS: Sie tanzt Ballett auf einem Boot!
  EN TP: ballet on a rock
  de TP: Ballett auf einem Felsen
  EN FP: ballet in a studio
  de FP: Ballett im Studio
1610 | balcony (noun): an open platform with a railing on a building | loc: Balkon
  EN TS: The moon lights the balcony.
  de TS: Der Mond beleuchtet den Balkon.
  EN FS: A lamp lights the balcony.
  de FS: Eine Lampe beleuchtet den Balkon.
  EN TP: a moonlit balcony
  de TP: ein mondbeschienener Balkon
  EN FP: a sunny balcony
  de FP: ein sonniger Balkon
1611 | dove (noun): the white bird used as a sign of peace | loc: Taube
  EN TS: A dove is flying in the light.
  de TS: Eine Taube fliegt im Licht.
  EN FS: A crow is flying in the light.
  de FS: Eine Krähe fliegt im Licht.
  EN TP: a dove with open wings
  de TP: eine Taube mit ausgebreiteten Flügeln
  EN FP: a dove in a cage
  de FP: eine Taube im Käfig
1612 | korea (noun): a country in East Asia, next to China and Japan | loc: Korea
  EN TS: Kids from Korea are waving.
  de TS: Kinder aus Korea winken.
  EN FS: Kids from Korea are dancing.
  de FS: Kinder aus Korea tanzen.
  EN TP: kids from Korea waving
  de TP: winkende Kinder aus Korea
  EN FP: kids from Korea singing
  de FP: singende Kinder aus Korea
1613 | rocket (noun): a vehicle shaped like a tube that flies into space | loc: Rakete
  EN TS: Three rockets are taking off!
  de TS: Drei Raketen heben ab!
  EN FS: Two rockets are taking off!
  de FS: Zwei Raketen heben ab!
  EN TP: rockets rising at sunset
  de TP: Raketen steigen im Abendrot auf
  EN FP: a rocket landing at sunset
  de FP: eine Rakete landet im Abendrot
1614 | spain (noun): a country in south-west Europe next to Portugal | loc: Spanien
  EN TS: Bulls are running in Spain!
  de TS: In Spanien rennen Stiere!
  EN FS: Horses are running in Spain!
  de FS: In Spanien rennen Pferde!
  EN TP: bulls running in Spain
  de TP: rennende Stiere in Spanien
  EN FP: horses racing in Spain
  de FP: Pferderennen in Spanien
1617 | angel (noun): a holy winged being that protects people | loc: Engel
  EN TS: The angel is guiding a child.
  de TS: Der Engel führt ein Kind.
  EN FS: The angel is guiding a lamb.
  de FS: Der Engel führt ein Lamm.
  EN TP: an angel guiding a child
  de TP: ein Engel führt ein Kind
  EN FP: an angel playing a harp
  de FP: ein Engel spielt Harfe
1618 | angel (noun): a holy winged being that protects people | loc: Engel
  EN TS: Angels are flying around him.
  de TS: Engel fliegen um ihn herum.
  EN FS: Birds are flying around him.
  de FS: Vögel fliegen um ihn herum.
  EN TP: winged angels in the clouds
  de TP: geflügelte Engel in den Wolken
  EN FP: angels on a Christmas tree
  de FP: Engel am Weihnachtsbaum
1619 | sail (noun): the large cloth that catches the wind | loc: Segel
  EN TS: The big ship has full sails.
  de TS: Das große Schiff hat volle Segel.
  EN FS: The big ship has no sails.
  de FS: Das große Schiff hat keine Segel.
  EN TP: full sails in the wind
  de TP: volle Segel im Wind
  EN FP: torn sails in the wind
  de FP: zerrissene Segel im Wind
1620 | heaven (noun): the holy place above the clouds with angels | loc: Himmel
  EN TS: Heaven looks very busy today.
  de TS: Im Himmel herrscht heute ja Hochbetrieb.
  EN FS: Heaven looks very empty today.
  de FS: Im Himmel herrscht heute ja tote Hose.
  EN TP: cherubs flying in heaven
  de TP: Putten fliegen im Himmel
  EN FP: a heaven full of saints
  de FP: ein Himmel voller Heiliger
1623 | skyscraper (noun): a very tall building with many floors | loc: Wolkenkratzer
  EN TS: So many skyscrapers!
  de TS: So viele Wolkenkratzer!
  EN FS: So many bridges!
  de FS: So viele Brücken!
  EN TP: skyscrapers at dusk
  de TP: Wolkenkratzer in der Dämmerung
  EN FP: a skyscraper being built
  de FP: ein Wolkenkratzer im Bau
1625 | surfboard (noun): the long board you stand on to ride waves | loc: Surfbrett
  EN TS: The surfer holds a surfboard.
  de TS: Der Surfer hält ein Surfbrett.
  EN FS: The surfer holds a guitar.
  de FS: Der Surfer hält eine Gitarre.
  EN TP: holding a surfboard upright
  de TP: ein Surfbrett aufrecht halten
  EN FP: riding a surfboard on waves
  de FP: auf einem Surfbrett Wellen reiten
1629 | pineapple (noun): a big sweet tropical fruit with spiky skin | loc: Ananas
  EN TS: Just one pineapple. So lonely.
  de TS: Nur eine Ananas. So einsam.
  EN FS: Just one banana. So lonely.
  de FS: Nur eine Banane. So einsam.
  EN TP: a single upright pineapple
  de TP: eine einzelne aufrechte Ananas
  EN FP: a pineapple cut in slices
  de FP: eine Ananas in Scheiben
1630 | octopus (noun): the sea animal with eight long arms | loc: Krake
  EN TS: The octopus has eight arms. I counted.
  de TS: Der Krake hat acht Arme. Ich hab gezählt.
  EN FS: The octopus has six arms. I counted.
  de FS: Der Krake hat sechs Arme. Ich hab gezählt.
  EN TP: an octopus with eight arms
  de TP: ein Krake mit acht Armen
  EN FP: an octopus in a jar
  de FP: ein Krake im Glas
1631 | witch (noun): a woman with magic powers in stories | loc: die Hexe
  EN TS: The witch has a broom. Smart.
  de TS: Die Hexe hat einen Besen. Schlau.
  EN FS: The witch has a cat. Smart.
  de FS: Die Hexe hat eine Katze. Schlau.
  EN TP: a witch with her broom
  de TP: eine Hexe mit ihrem Besen
  EN FP: a witch on her broom
  de FP: eine Hexe auf ihrem Besen
1633 | statue (noun): a figure of a person or creature made of stone | loc: Statue
  EN TS: This statue is watching you.
  de TS: Diese Statue beobachtet dich.
  EN FS: This dog is watching you.
  de FS: Dieser Hund beobachtet dich.
  EN TP: a gargoyle statue
  de TP: eine Wasserspeier-Statue
  EN FP: a horse statue
  de FP: eine Pferdestatue
1635 | mermaid (noun): a storybook woman with a fish tail | loc: Meerjungfrau
  EN TS: Mermaid tail? Totally green.
  de TS: Meerjungfrauenschwanz? Voll grün.
  EN FS: Mermaid tail? Totally blue.
  de FS: Meerjungfrauenschwanz? Voll blau.
  EN TP: a smiling cartoon mermaid
  de TP: eine lächelnde Comic-Meerjungfrau
  EN FP: a mermaid on a rock
  de FP: eine Meerjungfrau auf einem Felsen
1638 | curtain (noun): a piece of cloth that hangs across a window | loc: Vorhang | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Curtains frame a moonlit sea.
  de TS: Vorhänge rahmen ein Meer im Mondlicht ein.
  EN FS: Curtains frame a sunny sea.
  de FS: Vorhänge rahmen ein sonniges Meer ein.
  EN TP: heavy purple curtains
  de TP: schwere lila Vorhänge
  EN FP: heavy purple carpets
  de FP: schwere lila Teppiche
1639 | stable (noun): a building where farm animals are kept | loc: Stall
  EN TS: Fact: the baby is in a stable.
  de TS: Fakt: Das Baby liegt in einem Stall.
  EN FS: Fact: the baby is in a castle.
  de FS: Fakt: Das Baby liegt in einem Schloss.
  EN TP: a baby in a stable
  de TP: ein Baby im Stall
  EN FP: a horse in a stable
  de FP: ein Pferd im Stall
1641 | scary (adjective): making you feel afraid | loc: gruselig
  EN TS: A scary clown and a crow.
  de TS: Ein gruseliger Clown und eine Krähe.
  EN FS: A scary clown and a cat.
  de FS: Ein gruseliger Clown und eine Katze.
  EN TP: scary eyes in the sky
  de TP: gruselige Augen am Himmel
  EN FP: a scary movie night
  de FP: ein gruseliger Filmabend
1642 | village (noun): a place where people live, smaller than a town | loc: Dorf
  EN TS: The village sky is red.
  de TS: Der Himmel über dem Dorf ist rot.
  EN FS: The village sky is blue.
  de FS: Der Himmel über dem Dorf ist blau.
  EN TP: a village at sunset
  de TP: ein Dorf bei Sonnenuntergang
  EN FP: a village under deep snow
  de FP: ein Dorf unter tiefem Schnee
1643 | hat (noun): headwear that protects the head from bad weather | loc: Hut
  EN TS: He wears a cowboy hat.
  de TS: Er trägt einen Cowboyhut.
  EN FS: He wears a baseball cap.
  de FS: Er trägt eine Baseballkappe.
  EN TP: a wide cowboy hat
  de TP: ein breiter Cowboyhut
  EN FP: a wide straw hat
  de FP: ein breiter Strohhut
1644 | armor (noun): metal clothing that protects a fighter | loc: Rüstung
  EN TS: The knight wears full armor.
  de TS: Der Ritter trägt eine komplette Rüstung.
  EN FS: The knight wears no armor.
  de FS: Der Ritter trägt keine Rüstung.
  EN TP: a knight in metal armor
  de TP: ein Ritter in Metallrüstung
  EN FP: a knight without armor
  de FP: ein Ritter ohne Rüstung
1647 | postcard (noun): a card with a picture you write on and send | loc: Postkarte
  EN TS: A woman is on the postcard.
  de TS: Auf der Postkarte ist eine Frau.
  EN FS: A man is on the postcard.
  de FS: Auf der Postkarte ist ein Mann.
  EN TP: an old torn postcard
  de TP: eine alte, zerrissene Postkarte
  EN FP: a postcard of a beach
  de FP: eine Postkarte von einem Strand
1649 | colorful (adjective): having striking, bright color | loc: bunt
  EN TS: Everything here is colorful!
  de TS: Hier ist alles bunt!
  EN FS: Everything here is grey!
  de FS: Hier ist alles grau!
  EN TP: a colorful rainbow path
  de TP: ein bunter Regenbogenweg
  EN FP: a colorful umbrella
  de FP: ein bunter Regenschirm
1650 | cliff (noun): a high steep wall of rock | loc: Klippe
  EN TS: Nice castle, scary cliff.
  de TS: Schönes Schloss, gruselige Klippe.
  EN FS: Nice castle, scary bridge.
  de FS: Schönes Schloss, gruselige Brücke.
  EN TP: a chateau on a cliff
  de TP: ein Schloss auf einer Klippe
  EN FP: a cliff above the sea
  de FP: eine Klippe über dem Meer
1651 | cloak (noun): a long loose coat with no sleeves | loc: Umhang
  EN TS: Her blue cloak has stars.
  de TS: Ihr blauer Umhang hat Sterne.
  EN FS: Her red cloak has stars.
  de FS: Ihr roter Umhang hat Sterne.
  EN TP: a star-covered blue cloak
  de TP: ein blauer Umhang voller Sterne
  EN FP: a cloak made of feathers
  de FP: ein Umhang aus Federn
1652 | touch (verb): to put your fingers on something gently | loc: berühren
  EN TS: She will touch the butterfly!
  de TS: Gleich berührt sie den Schmetterling!
  EN FS: She will touch the bird!
  de FS: Gleich berührt sie den Vogel!
  EN TP: to touch a glowing butterfly
  de TP: einen leuchtenden Schmetterling berühren
  EN FP: to catch a glowing butterfly
  de FP: einen leuchtenden Schmetterling fangen
1653 | goldfish (noun): a small orange fish people keep as a pet | loc: Goldfisch
  EN TS: The cat wants the goldfish...
  de TS: Die Katze will den Goldfisch …
  EN FS: The cat wants the bird...
  de FS: Die Katze will den Vogel …
  EN TP: a goldfish in a bowl
  de TP: ein Goldfisch im Glas
  EN FP: a goldfish in a pond
  de FP: ein Goldfisch im Teich
1655 | crown (noun): a gold ring worn on the head by a king or queen | loc: Krone
  EN TS: Wow, her crown is so tall!
  de TS: Wow, ihre Krone ist so hoch!
  EN FS: Wow, her crown is so small!
  de FS: Wow, ihre Krone ist so klein!
  EN TP: a tall golden crown
  de TP: eine hohe goldene Krone
  EN FP: a small silver crown
  de FP: eine kleine silberne Krone
1656 | lips (noun): the two soft edges of your mouth | loc: Lippen
  EN TS: Her lips are red.
  de TS: Ihre Lippen sind rot.
  EN FS: Her lips are blue.
  de FS: Ihre Lippen sind blau.
  EN TP: shiny red lips
  de TP: glänzende rote Lippen
  EN FP: lips on a glass
  de FP: ein Lippenabdruck auf einem Glas
1658 | dark (adjective): without light or brightness | loc: dunkel
  EN TS: Dark stone, red roses, cool.
  de TS: Dunkler Stein, rote Rosen, cool.
  EN FS: Dark stone, white roses, cool.
  de FS: Dunkler Stein, weiße Rosen, cool.
  EN TP: a dark gothic archway
  de TP: ein dunkler gotischer Torbogen
  EN FP: a dark forest path
  de FP: ein dunkler Waldweg
1660 | treasure (noun): a store of gold, jewels and valuable things | loc: Schatz | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: A chest full of treasure!
  de TS: Eine Truhe voller Schätze!
  EN FS: A chest full of bottles!
  de FS: Eine Truhe voller Flaschen!
  EN TP: an open treasure chest
  de TP: eine offene Schatztruhe
  EN FP: a treasure map on paper
  de FP: eine Schatzkarte auf Papier
1661 | time (noun): what clocks measure, in hours and minutes | loc: Zeit
  EN TS: The time is a bit unclear.
  de TS: Die Zeit ist etwas unklar.
  EN FS: The map is a bit unclear.
  de FS: Die Karte ist etwas unklar.
  EN TP: telling the time
  de TP: die Uhrzeit ablesen
  EN FP: a time machine
  de FP: eine Zeitmaschine
1664 | priest (noun): a man who leads services in a church | loc: Priester
  EN TS: The priest is listening.
  de TS: Der Priester hört zu.
  EN FS: The priest is singing.
  de FS: Der Priester singt.
  EN TP: a priest in a confessional
  de TP: ein Priester im Beichtstuhl
  EN FP: a priest at a wedding
  de FP: ein Priester bei einer Hochzeit
1665 | ancient (adjective): very old, from thousands of years ago | loc: uralt
  EN TS: She is in an ancient temple.
  de TS: Sie ist in einem uralten Tempel.
  EN FS: She is in an ancient castle.
  de FS: Sie ist in einem uralten Schloss.
  EN TP: an ancient Egyptian temple
  de TP: ein uralter ägyptischer Tempel
  EN FP: an ancient Greek temple
  de FP: ein uralter griechischer Tempel
1666 | pharaoh (noun): a king of ancient Egypt | loc: Pharao
  EN TS: A cobra sits on the pharaoh.
  de TS: Auf dem Pharao sitzt eine Kobra.
  EN FS: A falcon sits on the pharaoh.
  de FS: Auf dem Pharao sitzt ein Falke.
  EN TP: a pharaoh in profile
  de TP: ein Pharao im Profil
  EN FP: a pharaoh on a throne
  de FP: ein Pharao auf dem Thron
1667 | paris (noun): the capital city of France | loc: Paris
  EN TS: Paris at night. Pure magic!
  de TS: Paris bei Nacht. Pure Magie!
  EN FS: Paris at noon. Pure magic!
  de FS: Paris am Mittag. Pure Magie!
  EN TP: Paris at night
  de TP: Paris bei Nacht
  EN FP: Paris in the rain
  de FP: Paris im Regen
1669 | wing (noun): a movable body part used for flying | loc: Flügel
  EN TS: Two wings, but the statue can't fly.
  de TS: Zwei Flügel, aber die Statue kann nicht fliegen.
  EN FS: Four wings, but the statue can't fly.
  de FS: Vier Flügel, aber die Statue kann nicht fliegen.
  EN TP: two feathered wings
  de TP: zwei gefiederte Flügel
  EN FP: two plane wings
  de FP: zwei Flugzeugflügel
1670 | london (noun): the capital city of England | loc: London
  EN TS: A red bus in London. Classic.
  de TS: Ein roter Bus in London. Klassiker.
  EN FS: A red car in London. Classic.
  de FS: Ein rotes Auto in London. Klassiker.
  EN TP: a red bus in London
  de TP: ein roter Bus in London
  EN FP: a red bus in Paris
  de FP: ein roter Bus in Paris
1672 | prague (noun): the capital city of the Czech Republic | loc: Prag
  EN TS: Prague glows at dusk.
  de TS: Prag leuchtet in der Dämmerung.
  EN FS: Prague glows at noon.
  de FS: Prag leuchtet am Mittag.
  EN TP: Prague castle at dusk
  de TP: die Prager Burg in der Dämmerung
  EN FP: Prague castle in snow
  de FP: die Prager Burg im Schnee
1674 | purple (adjective): the color between red and blue | loc: lila
  EN TS: Purple sky, purple hills.
  de TS: Lila Himmel, lila Hügel.
  EN FS: Purple sky, green hills.
  de FS: Lila Himmel, grüne Hügel.
  EN TP: a purple starry sky
  de TP: ein lila Sternenhimmel
  EN FP: a purple flower field
  de FP: ein lila Blumenfeld
1675 | alone (adjective): kept apart from others, on your own | loc: allein
  EN TS: He stands alone by a tree.
  de TS: Er steht allein an einem Baum.
  EN FS: He stands alone by a house.
  de FS: Er steht allein an einem Haus.
  EN TP: alone in an empty field
  de TP: allein auf einem leeren Feld
  EN FP: alone in an empty room
  de FP: allein in einem leeren Raum
